BOOK THE FIRST.
THE WISSAHIKON.
CHAPTER THE FIRST.
THE QUAKER AND HIS DAME.
These
be troublous times, damethese be
troublous
times, said the Quaker as he took his pipe
from his mouth, and drew his chair nearer to the
cheerful flame that blazed upon the hearth. The
October night is cooland verily the fire is
comfortable
.
I mind me not of a season, when the
month opened with such a nipping frostand yet
the woods of the quiet Wissahikon are scarce faded
by it. These are troublous timesdoes thee not
think so, Hannah?
Yes, Joab, replied the Quaker dame,
smoothing
a crease out of her apron with her hand: I
do think that the times are full of trouble. What
with the men of war, with their flaunting red
dresses, with their war horses and their shouting,
their cymbals and their drums, their cannons and
their weapons of war; our quiet home on the
Wissahikon
,
is a quiet home no longer. But as the
Lord wills it, so let it be!
The Quaker farmer took his pipe from his mouth,
sent a volume of tobacco-smoke rolling to the rafters
of the apartment, and then with a distinct hem
resumed his meditative luxury again.
Verily, Joab, there is not a window of our
habitation
,
from which we may look, without seeing
the tents of these men of strife. Well do I
remember
the time when first thee took me to be thy
wedded wife; then thee was used to go peacefully
to the field, to thy labor in the morning, and I could
bake my bread, and scour my pewter in quietness,
without a great big, idle fellow of a soldier, popping
into our tenement, and taking what he pleased for
his own, and looking at our daughter Marjorie as
though he meant no good. Well do I mind me of
the timebut was thee not over to Germantown
this afternoon, Joab? The Quaker nodded assent.
Did thee hear any thing new of the man
Cornwallis
,
or aught of George Washington?
I found the village people much affrighted.
Some were removing their worldly goods, some
were talking loudly and calling their neighbors
`Whig' and `Tory,' and all were running to and
fro, in great confusion and bustle. I asked what
all this meantand verily the village people
answered
,
that the man Cornwallis, who has posted
his scarlet men, across the village, near the mansion
of friend Chew, to the Delaware on one side, and
through our quiet woods along to the Wissahikon
on the other, did purpose some mischief to the men
of friend Washington. But I couldn't get head nor
tail of the story. But of a certainty shall we have
trouble shortly, Hannah.
I fear thee speakest that which shall come to
pass, Joab, replied the dame, and then both farmer
and his wife appeared to give themselves up to the
melancholy contemplation of the evils predicted.
The whole scene was one of Pennsylvania's olden
time. The blazing light of the hickory fire,
flickering
round the apartment, showing the substantial
forms of the Quaker and his dame, in bold relief,
and mingling with the beams of the setting sun,
which streamed through the deep silled window;
the massive rafters which formed the ceiling of the
spacious room; the snow-white walls and neatly
sanded floor; the oaken table in one corner; the
shelves heavy with masses of burnished pewter,
all were characteristic of that quiet, domestic life,
so rarely discovered in any place, save under the
green trees and pleasant shade of the country.
The farmer was in the prime of vigorous
manhood
,
with features of massive solidity, a broad and
low forehead, a short, square nose, a wide mouth
with thin lips, prominent chin, high cheek bones
and a dark grey sparkling eye; and with a frame
of great muscular power, and physical strength,
long and sinewy arms, and prominent chest whose
ample development his Quaker garb, with all its
volume, and want of shape, could not altogether
conceal. You would have picked him out in a
crowd, as the man to head a charge of dragoons,
rather than suppose him the quiet Friend, whose
theory and practice alike shunned the noise and
bustle of war.
His dame was full and portly in figure, with a
calm, placid face, and light blue eyes, expressive
of a mild and domestic disposition. Her hair was
half concealed, by the plain cap of the Quaker sect,
and her gown was modelled with the invariable
simplicity of hue and shape, peculiar to the
sisters
of the peace-loving and form-shunning society.
In truth, Hannah, exclaimed Joab after a
pause, as he laid down his pipe and extending his
hands to receive the cheerful warmth of the flame,
he gazed with a complacent glance around the
spacious arch of the fire-place. In truth,
Hannah
,
we have fallen upon evil times. The sword
of war hangs over the land, the dust of the
highways
is laid with the blood of our neighbors and
worldly friends, and the quiet streams run crimson,
with the butchery of the men of strife. This war
parts father and son, husband and wife, mother
and child.
Yes, responded Hannah, from the other side
of the fire-place. There is the rich Englishman
Tracy, whose mansion is pitched on the rock that
looks down into the vale of the Wissahikon, beyond
the bend 'tother side of Rittenhouse's Milldid he
not cast his son from him as though he were
unworthy
of all fatherly love and affection, because
he favored the men of George Washington?
Marry, Joab, I often wonder what has become of
the poor youth, who hath his father's curse upon
him?
I learned 'tother day, from some friends of
Washington, that Herbert Tracy, that delicately
reared youth, joined the Continentals last winter,
with a number of his father's tenants; and I
likewise
learned that he endured the biting cold as
bravely, and slept on the bare earth as cheerfully,
as the humblest of Washington's people. The son
of our neighborHenry Heft, commonly called
Harry Heft, was with the young man Tracy.
The last sentence was uttered by the Quaker,
with a covert glance at the countenance of his
dame, as though he expected the name of the young
farmer to excite some interest in her mind. He
was not disappointed, for the Quakeress gave a
quick, nervous start, and exclaimed, with the rapid
and hurried manner, peculiar to the keenest anxiety
Joab, what didst thee hear of the young man
Heft? Surely he has met with no harm? He was
a good youth, albeit somewhat wild. Why did
thee not tell me of this sooner? I should be sorry
where harm to come to him, for, for
For he hath made offers of marriage to our
daughter Marjorie, thee would say? Nay, nay,
dame, were he alive and well, standing at this
moment
before me, he might not unite his lot with
our child. There was a time when I had hope of
the boy, when I thought he would be one of us,
and assume the peaceful garb of the Friendsbut
no sooner did young Tracy go to the wars, than
Harry must be off also, and fight, and cut and
thrust, I warrant thee, with the worst of them.
Nay, nay, Hannah
Well, if it must be so, it must. I fear thee
speakest truth. But in verity it is painful to think
how much trouble and strife among kindred and
friends, this dreadful war hath caused. There was
the daughter of old Waltham, whose country seat
is on the Ridge Road near the Falls of Schuylkill;
he is rich, and full of worldly goods, thee knowest
Joab: she, the maiden his daughter, was to be
married
to young Tracy, when the quarrel occurred
between father and son, and the match was broken
off. Ah, me! 'tis a troublous time, for the sons of
men, Joab.
But at this moment, as if some unexpected
thought had ruffled the usual serenity of his mind,
the Quaker rose from his seat, and walked
hurriedly
to the deep silled window of the apartment
looking to the west, and gazing upon landscape of
hill, valley and stream, for a moment he seemed
lost in thought, or wrapt in the mild quietude, that
attends the contemplation of a lovely sunset, to a
mind sobered by age and experience.
CHAPTER THE SECOND.
THE MAIDEN.
The
view was full of natural beauty.
Immediately
in front of the window extended a small
flower garden, surrounded by a wicket fence, made
lovely to the eye by groups of wild flowers of
every tint and hue, green arbors, overshadowed by
luxuriant vines, transplanted by a fair hand from
the glades of the forest, and pleasant walks, and
winding paths, separated from the flower beds by
delicate lines of greenest grass, while a fair form
flitting from arbor to arbor, might well have seemed
the divinity of the rural paradise. Beyond the
garden
,
a sloping pasturage some hundred yards in
extent, bounded on either side by forest trees, sank
down in a gentle descent until its verdant turf was
laved by the ripples of the quiet Wissahikon;
which flowed silently on, from a mass of
greenwood
,
along the shores of the meadow, under the
shade of the trees on the opposite bank, until it
was lost in the forest of verdure which terminated
the view to the south. The opposite bank of the
stream arose in a swelling hill, covered with lofty
forest trees, the giant-turnked oak, the leafy
chestnut
,
and branching beech, whose luxuriant foliage,
but faintly tinged by the bright red, and glaring
yellow of autumn, was basking in the mellowing
light of the setting sun, as he sank with half
concealed
disc behind the woodlands. The sky was
clear and serene, with light masses of clouds
floating
in the pathway of the sun. The whole
western
horizon was bathed in light of mellowed gold,
while the zenith expanded with its intensity of
autumnal
azurelike the dome of this fair temple of
naturefar,far above, and there was a holy quietude,
a twilight solemnity resting upon that world-hidden
vale, that appealed to the highest and kindliest
feelings of our nature.
The view was lovely, the foliage luxuriant, the
sky serene, the meadow verdant as with the first
kiss of spring, but neither view, foliage, sky nor
pasturage, seemed to attract the attention of the
farmer
by reason of their mere natural beauties, but
rather from some association of memory, which
fixed the valley of the Wissahikon as the scene
of some well remembered incident of other days.
Joab gazed for an instant upon this scene, and
then turning away with a hurried step, sought the
other window of the apartment, which opened a
view to the north. There were undulating hills
and green woodlands and brown fields of upturned
earth and white patches of ripe buckwheat, but
upon hill top, and gleaming from the foliage of the
forest, and dotting the russet of the cultivated fields
with strips of white, extended the tents of the
British
camp, traversing as far as the eye could reach,
the tract of country between the village of
Germantown
and the river Schuylkill, while at short
intervals waved the Cross of St. George, stained
with the best blood of the children of the soil; and
the hirelings of power, in their gaudy trappings,
with their well burnished arms, were observed
moving hither and thither along the line of the
encampment
.
The view did not by any means seem
to soothe the mind of the Quaker, into its usual
quietude.
I tell thee, wife, it is in vainin vain! he
exclaimed again turning to the window looking out
upon the Wissahikon. I cannot stifle the
remembrance
.
I stood herehere at this window,
and saw him dieand yet I had a hand, a strong
hand and a stout arm, but I might not strike. I
beheld him die
Of whom does thee speak, Joab? asked dame
Hannah, amazed at the excited demeanor of the
staid Quaker. Methinks thee is wondrously
flurried
,
Joab!
Here I beheld him die. The son of the poor
widow over the creekthat poor trumpeter boy in
the American camp, he continued, his manner
becoming more excited as he proceeded. It was
just such an evening as this, save that it happened
in the bloom of spring. He had won his way
through the hosts of the enemyhe had heard his
mother was sick unto deathand he wished if she
was indeed dying to close her eyes. He had won
his way through the hosts of the enemy, he had
gained this meadow, when thundering at his back
came the scarlet men of war on their stout horses,
with their flashing swords. He shrieked for mercy
and I heard his shriek, but might not, could not
save him. He shrieked for mercy, and their swords
were bathed in the warm blood of his heart. He
was a fair youth, but 'twas a ghastly sightthat
ruddy cheek crusted in the cold blood; those
golden locks dyed in crimson red. Ah, 'twas a
fearful sightandIcould not save him
In verity 'twas a most pitiful sight! The Lord
have mercy on his murderers!
I could notcould not save himcontinued
the Quaker. But still I beheld him die! He
raised his eyes and hands to Heaven. Father of
mercyhe exclaimedif blood crying from the
earth to thee for recompense, is ever in thy
wisdom
avenged, surely the account of these scarlet
men is deeply dyed, and cries for ten fold
vengeance
!
He was but a boy and yet they killed
him!
'Twas a dreadful sighta doleful sight,
sobbed
dame Hannah. In truth a doleful sight! The
Lord be good to us, what is that? she exclaimed,
with an outburst of surprise, as a loud and
piercing
shriek arose from the garden without, and
rang through the farm house. The Quaker started
quickly at the sound, but ere he had time to move
a step or whisper a word, the sound of hurried
footsteps
was heard, the door of the apartment was flung
hurriedly open, and a girl in the full summer of
youth, rushed into the room, her dark hair floating
in masses of jet, down over her neck and shoulders,
and streaming in unconfined luxuriance over her
virgin bosom, bared by the hand of violence. As
she rushed into the room, she was followed by a
coarse, ruffian-like man in the dress of a British
dragoon, who with a drunken shout, and look of
imbecile intoxication, had seized on the 'kerchief
which veiled her bosom, and while she fled to her
father's arms, pursued her footsteps.
Save me!Fathersave me! cried the
maiden
clinging to the farmer's neck.
Come my pretty lassiedon't be afraid
exclaimed
the drunken soldier, as he sprang across the
floor with unsteady steps. Don't be afraid, lassie
don't
Come, feller, this is going a little too far
exclaimed
a strange voice, and a blow from behind
felled the soldier to the oaken planks of the floor.
It was a good stout blow, and it laid the
crimson-hued
dragoon, as quietly down, as a new born babe.
The Quaker who had not time to raise a hand in
defence
of the maiden, glanced at the stranger and
beheld
the form of a young man in the prime of early
manhood, of a strong, muscular and well
proportioned
frame, with a face full of honest intelligence
of expression, lighted by the gleam of a dare
devil eye, and a look beaming with ingenuous
frankness
and manly courage.
That's a nice specimen of the terror of turkey
cocks! exclaimed the stranger, eyeing the
prostrated
soldier, with a gaze of quiet admiration. A
nice pattern of a scare crow to keep turkey gobblers
out of the corn! Haint it, uncle Joab? What d'ye
say, aunt Hannah?did ever you see sich a beast?
Harry Heft! exclaimed the maiden in
surprise
,
while her cheek was pale with her recent
affright
.
Harry Heft!
Henry Heft! And in this warlike guise!
exclaimed
the farmer, participating in the
astonishment
of his daughter.
Why, Henry Heft! Where did thee come
from? said the dame, in a tone of quiet
amazement
,
as her lips parted and her eyes distended
with surprise.
The scene would have made a picture. The
staid Joab, with his daughter resting on his right
arm, while the other was raised in involuntary
astonishment
;
the fair girl with her arms round her
father's neck, her dark hair falling in disordered
tresses over her shoulders and down her back, her
face, with beaming eyes as dark as night, and
dimmed
by tears, turned toward the young soldier,
while her bared bosom of virgin whiteness, and
youthful outline, heaved upward in the light, and
glowed with the warm flush that brightened over
her face and neck; the dame slightly in the
background
with hands raised and eyes distended; and
the young soldier in the foreground, unheeding the
exclamations of surprise, but gazing downward,
with his sparkling brown eyes, fixed in an
expression
of quiet humor, upon the form of the
insensible
dragoon, laid along the floor, in the careless
attitude
of helpless intoxication; all formed a quiet
picture for the pencil of John Smith, or any other
artist of similar celebrity.
Reely, jist to think of the feller's impudence!
exclaimed Harry Hefta'ter I'd travelled fifteen
miles, over hill and holler, and through the
red-coat
lines, not at all mentionin' my creepin' down
the Wissahikon to get cleer of the picquetsa'ter all
this trouble to get a look at Majorie there, and then
when I reach the garden gate, to find that feller
a-chaseing her about the flower beds jist as if he'd
a right to catch butterflies where he liked!
But where did thee come from, Henry? How
did thee git here? Is'nt thee in danger? What
does thee want? were the hurried questions asked
by the Quaker, who evidently knew not what to
think of young Heft's sudden appearance.
That's what I call unrollin' the whole
catechism
at once. Now uncleI call you uncle, not
because you're my fa'ther's brother, but because it
sounds sociable, (the same to you, aunt,) jist set down
there while I shut the door. Thereit's bolted, now
let me roll this sleepin' scarecrow under the table.
Majorie, dear, let me put your 'kerchief round your
neck. There nowwhat's the use of blushing so
did'nt I pay the scoundrel for his impu'dence?
Now all of you sit down 'round the fire-place, jist
as we used to do in old timesMajorie, you sit by
meuncle, you sit there, and aunt, you sit there.
Now then I'll tell you all about it!
Henry, wherefore is thee in this warlike guise?
interrupted the Quaker.
That's what I was jist a-going to tell you. But
howsomever as I've precious little time to spare,
I'll jist cut a long story short, and let you know,
that I'm fresh from George Washington's army
which is not much farther off than the Skippack
Creek, some sixteen miles distance from this farm
house. (The Continentals may be a little nearer for
all you know.) I'm on a scouting partybut
p'raps you don't know what that is? You do
uncle
!
very well.
Where did thee go when thee left the
Wissahikon
last winter with young Herbert Tracy?
Why you must know that young Tracy raised
a company of mounted riflemen, from round about
the country here with whom he joined the
Continentals
.
He mustered some fifty good,
bold-handed
,
stout-hearted fellows. This is our
uniform
black
frock coat, or rather dark greyneat
little rifle with a ball that never failsshort sword
powder horn,light bootscap with the feather
of a night-hawk in the way of a plume, and that's
the reason why they calls us the night-hawks,
though our regular name is Captain Tracy's Rifles,
or the Black Rangers. We fight sometimes one by
one dropped about in spots, and most ginerally we
slam into the Britishers all in a bunch, with our
rifles cracking away, our plump black horses at the
top of their speed, and our jolly war-hurrah
splitting
the air over our heads. We've seen hard
fighting tooplenty of it. Twenty-six of our
good band left their bones at Brandywine. By the
Lord above us
Henry, Henry! What saith the scripture?
Take not the name of
I'm wrong, I know it. But these haint no times
for men to be pertikler about what they say. But
to the pint. I came as far as Chestnut Hill on a
scouting party, and then I came on here, through
the British lines, partly to see you folks here
partly to see my people over the creek, but more
'specially to reconnoitre round the mansion of our
captain's father, jist below the paper mill run.
Captain
Tracy thinks there's some mischief a-brewing,
and so I'll jist take a bit of something to eat if you
please, and be off. What's that red-coat grumbling
there about? He is the drunkenest
If I mistake not, interrupted Joab, he is the
servant of a young British officer, who with Colonel
Musgrave is at present staying at Mr. Tracy's down
the Wissahikon.
Hey, uncle! You don't say so! Then there's
mischief brewin' indeed,Colonel Musgrave and
old Tracy have always been as thick as thieves.
It's my opinion that the captain's father is going to
marry that Britisher's nephew of his to young Miss
Waltham, who was betrothed to our captain before
he joined the Continentals.
Who is his nephew? I never heard him
spoken of before, Henry.
Why, his name is Wellwood Tracyhe's a
Britisher born, and he's a leftenant among the
red-coats
.
Old Tracy says that he shall inherit his
estate when he dies. There's a father for you, to
cast off his natural born sonbut what's that fellow
grumbling about?
This way, this way, muttered the intoxicated
dragoon, raising himself from his resting place
under the table and gazing around with a vacant
stare, which showed that his thoughts were not at
all connected with the scene before him. This
wayparsonit isn't far. Two miles only along
the Wissahikon. You know where old Tracy
lives? They're to be married at eight o'clock
2
fine funplenty of drinkthe leftenant's a
glorious
fellow. Hurrahat 'em. And then the
drunken soldier performed various imaginary feats,
rode over imaginary regiments of Continentals,
emptied imaginary bottles, and sang very peculiar
poetical selections.
Very well, my fellervery well, exclaimed
Harry Heft, looking complacently at the
muttering
soldier. Very wellthat's jist what I
wanted to know. See here, Marjorie.
Drawing the blushing girl apart, Harry
whispered
in her ear, in a low voice, words which gave
a brighter sparkle to her dark black eyes, and
brought a livelier blush upon her budding cheek.
What d'ye think o' the plan, Marjorie?
Verily, replied the damsel, verily, Harry, I
think, she continued hesitatingly. That is I
like it very well, butbut, the rest of her reply
was lost in a whisper.
Henry, what did thee say to our daughter?
exclaimed the sedate Quaker. Really, it seemeth
to me
Never mind, unclenothing wrongnothing
wrong. Hist! there is the signal of my comrade
down in the hollow. I must be off, but I'll not
say good bye, for dead or alive you'll hear from
me soon. Now for old Tracy and old Waltham!
As he said this the young Ranger seized his
rifle from the fire-place and rushed out of the room,
as a clear shrill whistle was heard without, leaving
the black eyed Marjorie to explain the purport of
those whispered words as best she might.
The plan of my story makes it necessary to
picture
to the reader two distinct scenes or incidents
which occurred on the same evening of the
commencement
of the tale, at the hour of sunset in the
country around the village of Germantown. Now
for the first incident.
CHAPTER THE THIRD.
THE BLACK RANGERS.
As the last gleam of sunset glanced through the
foliage of a long line of towering elm and chestnut
trees, whose luxuriant verdure marked the course of
a winding bye road, some three miles north of
Chestnut
Hill, a party of soldiers were pursuing their
way, under the interlacing boughs, that made a
pastoral
arcade of the serpentine lane, and shielded
their path and persons from any intrusive observer.
The soldiers, numbering some twenty-five in all,
were mounted each on a stout and well limbed
steed, black in hue, with flowing mane and tail.
Their tall and sinewy forms were clad in a costume
which, peculiar to their body, would have marked
them out for observation amid the gaudy trappings
of a numerous army. They wore black coats,
reaching
to the knee, and fitting closely over their
prominent
and muscular chests, and varied in
appearance
by a border of black fur around the skirt of
the garment, with a plain line of braiding running
up in front, until it was terminated by the simple
upright collar, buttoning closely round the neck.
A belt of dark leather, from which depended a
powder horn, was slung across the breast; another
belt of similar material girdled the waist,
supporting
the scabbard of a short straight sword; while
a glittering hunting knife, with handle of the wild
deer's antlers, depended from the right side; and
a small rifle, with barrel of elegant finish and
stock of mahogany, varied by ornaments of silver,
hung at the saddle-bow of each soldier. On the
head, each rifleman wore a small circular fur cap,
with a feather of the night-hawk, drooped to the
left side, to supply the place of a plume. Their
legs were encased as far as the knees, in well fiting
black boots, displaying the manly proportions of
each muscular leg, the bend below the knee, the
prominent calf and sloping ankle, to every
advantage
.
Each man of the party was tall, broad chested,
and well proportioned, and each bore upon his
scarred and rugged features, the marks of the spear
thrust, the sword cut, and the bullet wound. They
were such men as would have delighted the heart
of a crusading knight of the thirteenth century,
with all the wild love of adventureall the daring
courage, and all the frank, hardy qualities which
mark the soldier, whoas the old writer phrases
itfight for his own hand independent of the
great body of an army. And then they sat on
their steeds so well, so gallantly; each ranger
riding firm and erect, adapting his limbs to the
movement of the horse, and guiding him without
having any recourse to the bridle.
It would have been no easy matter to have
picked men of such form, strength and stature from
a regiment of common soldiers, yet the leader of
the Black Rangers, who rode at their head, was to
all appearances, as much superior in all these, as
well as many other qualities to his own gallant
band, as they were superior to the promiscuous
gatherings of an army.
Tall in stature, with a form moulded with the
outline of physical power softened by the gentler
proportions of manly grace, an air and beauty that
marked him out from the mass of common men, a
face warmed with the glow of youth, yet impressed
with the indelible lines of thought, Herbert
Arnheim
Tracy was in every point of view worthy of
his reputation (won in the short compass of a year)
of being one of the bravest among the brave, the
first in the storm, the foremost in the charge, the
most untiring in the pursuit, and as obnoxious to
the enemy in the retreat as in the chase.
His face impressed the observer with a high idea
of the intellect expressed in each lineament. His
forehead, high and pale, and bearing the wrinkles
of thought, was relieved by his raven black hair
which fell in luxuriant locks almost to his shoulders.
His eyes, of that deep and thoughtful blackness
which is ever accompanied by strong mental
powers, shone like coals of the living flame from
under his strongly marked and arching eyebrows,
with a clear, steady glance, that told of old
memories
stirring up within him, and prospects of the
dim future agitating the depths of his mind. His
nose was small and Grecian, his mouth a thought
too wide, with thin, expressive lips; his chin was
small prominent square and decided in its outline,
while the general contour of his face was in
harmony
with the regular lines of manly beauty.
As to his dress, he wore the uniform of his band,
the black frock coat, edged with fur; the boots of
a similar hue; the small sword was suspended from
his left side; the hunting knife was inserted in his
belt, and a small chain of burnished steel passed
over his left shoulder, supported a light hunting
horn of silver, rimmed with gold, which ever hung
ready for immediate use under his right arm. In
place of the feather of the night-hawk worn by his
men, his cap wore in front a long drooping plume
of eagles' feathers, which fell to one side, and
mingled with the luxuriant locks of his raven
hair.
Had you seen Captain Herbert Tracy's mind as
he then rode along the sequestered lane, at the
head of his gallant band, you would have discovered
many a bitter thought sweeping athwart the surface
of his soul, mingling with many a memory of olden
time, many a dreary imagining of future doom,
and many a thought of those he loved, who loved
him not, and many a musing of
one
who returned
his affection with a deep and burning passion.
A dream, a bright reverie of his early days was
now present with his fancy, and the sunny glades
and the shady recesses of the Wissahikon were
again around him, and again he wandered through
the forests that overlooked the world-hidden stream,
arm in arm with that father, from whose heart and
home he was now a stranger and an outcast.
And then came the memory of the bitter day,
when that father's curse rang in his ears. There
was the small library-room in which the dreamings
of his boyhood had been fed with the additional
fancies from the perusal of the tomes of romance.
The dull light of a November day came through
the solitary window of the apartment, and again,
with words of eloquent persuasion, his father, by
birth an Englishman, and a Loyalist from principle,
endeavored to convince his son of the rectitude of
the cause of Royalty and its intimate connection
with his future pursuits and expectations. For
after a life of voluntary exile from his native land,
after burying his mind and talents for years amid
the shades of the Wissahikon, while his heart was
eating itself away with deep broodings of one of
the last descendants of an honored line, condemned
to comparative penury, Major Herbert Wallingford
Tracy found himself suddenly placed by the death
of various intermediate heirs, but one remove from
the Earldom of Wallingford, whose domains were
located in one of the fairest counties of England,
where his ancestors, a long and honored line, had
lived and flourished since the Conquest. On the
death of the present aged and childless Earl, Major
Tracy would become Earl of Wallingford, and his
son, whose strong innate powers he had often noted
with all a parent's love, would, after his decease,
succeed to the title and estates of the ancient house,
to add, as the father hoped, renewed glory and
increased
honor to the records of the venerable line.
But all his hopes, the hopes of a bold, a strong
minded, and worldly ambitious man, soured by the
disappointments of youth into a misanthrope, were
met at the very outset, by the plain, candid, and
fearless declaration of his son, that he could not
draw his sword against the land that gave him
birth.
And then, wound up to a pitch of madness, by
this utter prostration of all his ambitious dreams,
for Major Tracy had thought to win royal favor for
his son, by the devotion of his influence and his
sword to the cause of royalty,the father raised
his hand to heaven, and with unquivering lip and
steady eye, cursed that son of all his hopes, and
then thrust him, like an unclean thing, from the
home of his infancy and the side of his betrothed.
Her father, Mr. Waltham, had refused to
consummate
2*
the marriage of his daughter with an outcast,
and pour his well filled coffers at the feet of one,
who was a rebel in his opinionnot to his royal
majesty George the Thirdbut, what was a matter
of much greater consequence, to the rich Squire
Waltham, a rebel to all that was high and holy in
religion or nature; or, in other words, that Herbert
Arnheim Tracy was a poor man.
When Herbert departed from the mansion of his
infancy, it was with the determination to join the
banner of Washington. A small fortune bequeathed
to him by a distant relative in Philadelphia, which
he was now enabled to claim, having just attained
his majority, afforded him the means of fitting out
a band of brave farmers' sons, who had known him
from his infancy, and other gallant spirits, and
embodying
them in a band which soon became widely
known as Captain Tracy's Mounted Rifles, the
Night Hawks or the Black Rangers.
In less than a year he had gained honor and
renown
,
and now, after an absence from the home of
his childhood of that duration, he found himself
returning toward the wilds of the Wissahikon, with
the thought of his father's curse hanging heavy over
his soul, and dismal forebodings of the future fate
of his betrothed, giving a melancholy tinge to all
his feelings and fancies.
His meditations were interrupted by the voice of
a war worn veteran at his side. He was a soldier
of a quarter of a century's growth, and had served
under Braddock in the old French wars.
We shall have warm work of it to-morrow
Cap'in.
Aye, Sergeant, we shall have warm work, most
certainly.
Trust our band will remember our trumpeter
boy, Capt'in.
He who was murdered some months since, you
mean? Our band of gallant fellows will never
forget
the massacre of the young trumpeter, Sergeant
Brown. How far do you think we are from the
British camp, Sergeant?
'Bout five miles, Capt'in; three miles to
Chestnut
Hill, and two from thence to Chew's House,
which I larn is the location of the Britishers'
campment
.
It must be about five miles then, to the Paper
Mill Run on the Wissahikon?
Jist the same, Capt'in.
Do you think it will be possible, Sergeant, to
pass the British lines, and reach the Run within an
hour's time?
Possible and impossible, Capt'in, jist as you
take it. If you take the bed of the Wissahikon,
and pass the Britishers under cover of the
brushwood
,
'long side of itthat's what I call possible,
and you'll succeed. If you try any other ways
that's what I call impossible, and you'll not
succeed
,
but you will get shot. But what is that thing
bowin' and scrapin' yonder?
Herbert looked in the direction pointed out by
the Sergeant, and discovered a singular figure,
bowing
and posturing after a most curious fashion, at
the distance of some twenty paces; directly in the
centre of the lane, in front of the Rangers'
pathway
.
On approaching nearer to this singular
figure, it resolved itself into a short,
broad-shouldered
negro, with an exceedingly large black face,
flat nose, thick lips and prominent chin, large eyes
with very small pupils, and very large whites;
hips and shin-bones of tremendous prominence, feet
of colossal size, and general figure as grotesque in
outline, and as ludicrous in proportion, as though
Nature had turned caricaturist, and manufactured a
walking libel upon the whole monkey tribe.
Massa Herbert, Massa Herbert exclaimed
the negro, making a profound bow as the Rangers
approachedIf dar ar be you jest say so, for
gorra-mighty, Lord bless us, dis nigger am tired
dat am a fac. I'b been hunting you, eber since
yesterday mornin', way up to de Skippack creek,
sixteen miles from here, as true as my name am
Charles de Fust, and I hab'ent found you till dis
berry instant. De berry debbil's to pay at home,
and
no pitch hot.
Why, Charley! is that you! cried Captain
Tracy, as he recognized one of his father's
domestics
in the negro, what message have you got for
me? Who sent you?
Dar's de message I hab for you, and Miss
Marian
Waltham sent me. True as my name's Charles
de Fust.
Herbert took the carefully folded note from the
hands of the negro, and, with a beating heart,
recognized
the handwriting of his betrothed in the
simple directionTo Captain Herbert Arnheim
Tracy. With a nervous hand he broke open the
seal, and read
October
2, 1777.
Dearest Herbert
I am in great distress, and
hemmed in by the most fearful dangers. If you
have any regard for our mutual love, our mutual
fate, come to me; come to me as soon as you have
read these lines. Nothing but your presence can
avert the fate of
Your betrothed,
Marian
.
God of Heaven! exclaimed Tracy, as his
cheek grew for a moment lividly palethe letter
is dated yesterday, and yet, Charles, you have
failed to deliver it until this moment. Tell me,
sirrah, he continued, raising himself in his stirrups,
as his eye flashed with angerWherefore this
neglect? Answer me truly, or by the God that
lives, the next tree and a strong cord shall be
yours!
Gorra-mighty, Lord bless us, sure as my name's
Charles de Fust, stammered the negro, half
frightened
out of his wits as he stood bowing in front of
Herbert's horse. Massa Herbert, what's de use
ob workin' yusef in a passhun? Dese am de facts
ob de case. Two days ago, Massa Waltham, who
libs on de Ridge Road, came ober to Major Tracy's
on a visit. Brought Miss Marian wid himand de
old fellow was seized by paralytic stroke while at
the Major'st'ought he was going to dieden him
and your fader make up match between his darter
and dat red coat scamp, Leftenant Wellwood Tracy.
Under dem circumstances Miss Marian dispatch me
off, wid dis note for you. Went up to deSkippack
could n't find you dar. Dey sed you was gone
out a scouting. Been a follering you up eber
sinceand here I be, and dere you are, and Miss
Marian's goin' to be married to dat renegate dis
ebenin'. So if you gwain to do anyting, you better
do it mighty dam quick. Sure's my name's Charles
de Fust.
Sergeant, cried Herbert, turning hurriedly
to the veteran Brown, who rode at his elbow.
You know the place of rendezvous? The
deserted
mansion among the copse of horse chestnut
trees, about a quarter of a mile hence?
The place called the Haunted House?
The same. Let the Rangers disperse in every
direction in search of intelligence as regards the
force, numbers, and position of the enemy. We
meet again at twelve to-night at the Haunted
House. It is now darkdisperse the Rangers,
Sergeant
!
The Sergeant touched his hat, and presently the
Rangers were seen disappearing in various
directions
.
Charles de Fust was left standing alone
with the Captain.
They have a desperate game to play, Herbert
muttered in a whisper, that came through his
clenched teeth. She is minemine by all that
is sacred. Wo be to him who shall say me nay!
By the God that lives
The oath was scattered to the air, and the
astonished
negro beheld Herbert plunging the spurs into
the sides of his ebon steed, who swept through field
and meadow with the speed of wind, and in an
instant
was lost in the shades of a neighboring forest.
Dat am berry perlite! Berry! To leave me all
alone here in de middle ob de road! Berry perlite;
Gorra-mighty, Lord bless ussure's my name's
Charles de Fust!
CHAPTER THE FOURTH
THE BETROTHED.
She
gazed upon that gorgeous sunset, the
beautiful
girl! She gazed from the arching window of her
chamber, at the setting sun, with her beaming face
flushed into brighter radiance with the last glimpse
of daylighther soft blue eyes dimmed with
bursting
tearsher pouting lips of most delicious
voluptuousness
of shape, parted by the rising sighand
her golden hued hair, floating in glossy richness
down each budding cheek, and along her arching
neck, and finally resting in beautiful disorder upon
that virgin bosom, with its veins of azure and its
outline of youth and bloom.
The beauty of Marian Waltham was of that
fascinating
character which so finely and delicately
blends the spiritual with the material, and charms
the beholder with a glance, a look, or a tone;
which enchains the fancy with every motion and
attracts the imagination in every attitude, throwing
the golden light of romance around the fair form
giving a brighter glance to the eye, a lovelier hue
to the velvet cheek, and a winning sweetness to the
tone, which seems to convey every idea of the
hidden
soul that words of human speech may fail to
utter.
Lovely as Marian was at all times, she certainly
never seemed more beautiful than on this eventful
evening, when gazing at the last beams of sunset,
from the spacious window of her chamber, situated
in the western wing of Major Tracy's mansion,
among the heights of the Wissahikon.
Her face, raised gently upward, received on each
glowing cheek, the soft flush of sunset; her eyes,
her large blue, lustrous orbs, half closed in
dreaming
thought, were impearled in a starting tear; her
mouth, with its small lips curving with a
fascinating
fulness, was slightly opened with the
listlessness
of reverie: her full rounded chin, sank with
all the richness of flowing outline into the arching
neck with its clear transparent hue, and around the
Grecian head, along each budding cheek, and over
her neck and shoulder streamed the luxuriant locks
of her waving hair, whose bright and silky gold,
glistening in the sunbeams, completed the
fascination
that hovered round her beauty like a veil of
light.
Her bust was ample, well proportioned, and
swelling in its outline, yet delicately formed and
full of virgin beauty; her waist small and tapering,
yet without any appearance of unnatural
confinement
or artificial restraint; while from her waist
downward the proportions of her fignre fell in a
voluptuous sweep, which gave indefinable
fascination
to every motion of those small and softly
chiselled
feet, whose fairy tracery of form peeped
from beneath the snow-white folds of the bridal
robe.
And those arms, full, fair, and rounded with the
floating line of grace, bared from the shoulder with
their beauty gleaming through the bewitching
sleeves of air-like lace, and the delicate hands with
miniature fingers half clasped in front supporting
the golden bracelet, which the maiden was about to
entwine around that wrist which needed no such
garish ornament; all these charmsthe face, the
floating hair, the half thoughtful, half dreaming
attitude
,
the air of winning innocence, the innocence
that implies ignorance of the world's customs, which
encircled the maiden's featuresall combined, made
her seem to the fascinated eye, pure as she was, a
being to be loved with all the depth of the passion
that springs from a high intellect, a being whose
entire soul, with all its gentle and modest affections
would dissolve in deep and lasting love, for the
object
of her choice.
Marian turned from the bright sunset and gazed
around her chamber. Ever since the intimate
friendship of Major Tracy and Squire Waltham had
given rise to frequent visits to the mansion of the
former, this chamber had been set apart for Marian
and furnished to her taste. The furniture was
attractive
without being gorgeous. The chamber
looked precisely the same as on the day when the
fair Marian first retired within its precincts to muse
on the gallant youth, who had saved her life,
endangered
by a wild and untamed horse, who rushed
with herself and father over a precipice, and
plunged
them into the waters of the Wissahikon. She
even now imagined the noble form of Herbert,
confronting
the maddened horse, and when his efforts
to stay the speed of the animal were in vain, again
the picture was colored by her fancy, how
gallantly
he sprang into the depths of the rivulet and
drew her fainting form and that of her dying father
to the shore. All this, and the subsequent scenes
of the confession of his love, her acknowledgment
of a mutual passion, and the betrothal, arose to her
vivid fancy, and the maiden dashed her father's
marriage present, the gaudy bracelet, to the floor,
and covering her face with her fair white hands,
she sought relief from the pressure of thought in a
flood of tears.
Her attention was attracted by the sound of a
footstep, and a low voice whispered her name.
She looked up and beheld her father. His frame
was thin and attenuated with disease, his shoulders
bent forward with premature extreme old age, and
the slight masses of grey hair, which fell from
under
his invalid's cap, strayed along each sunken
cheek, affording a fearful relief to the pale hue of
that face, with the features, distorted by pain, the
glassy eye, the shrunken lip and contracted brow.
Daughter, you are in tears, said Mr. Waltham,
laying a thin and withered hand upon Marian's
shoulder. It were better not to weep thus
bitterly
.
What must be, must. I have planned this
marriage, Marian, with an eye single to thy
happiness
he paused, for a violent fit of coughing
choked his utterance. When I am no more,
Marian, you will need a protector. Lieutenant
Wellwood Tracy
Marian turned her head away, and concealed her
face in her hands, at the name. Nay, Marian,
wherefore start you thus? Is not the Lieutenant
nobly born, and gallantly bred? Has he not wealth;
is not his name enrolled among the honored and
respected
of the world?
Father! My troth is plighted to another?
exclaimed Marian in that decided voice which
betokens the firmness of despairMy troth is
plighted to another!
An outcast and a beggar! exclaimed a strange
voice, and the tall form of Major Tracy stood
between
the father and daughterAn outcast and a
beggar! he continued, as a smile of mingled
contempt
and scorn curved his lips. Thy troth is
pledged to another forsooth? Why, Marian, I had
thought better of thee than this? What! would
you stoop to marry an outcast from his home, a
rebel from his king, a man who has drawn his
sword in most foul disloyalty, and by the
unsheathing
of that sword, blasphemed his God? Would
you marry a
beggar
, fair maiden?
As he said this Major Tracy's brow became
contracted
with a dark frown, and then his lip
trembled
momently with an expression of contempt.
His appearance was full of majesty, with his tall
form and erect bearing; and his high pallid brow,
seared by the wrinkles of worldly care and
ambitious
thought, was shown in bold relief, as the last
glow of sunset fell on its bold outline, with the dark
hair, sprinkled with the frost of age, thrown back
in careless disorder.
But the fair maiden quailed not before his glance.
Stung by his taunts into a reply, she raised her fair
form to its full stature, and with her blue eye,
flashing with a steady, unvarying glance, and with
her fair arm outstretched, she exclaimed in a quiet
tone
Can a
father
speak thus of his
son?
she
exclaimed
,
can a father so far forget all feelings of
natural affection, as to curse, with bitter words and
sneering manner, the child, whom he is bound, by
every law of God and man, to love and protect?
Not thus does a maiden speak of her betrothed
husband
!
No! Though Herbert were a beggar, clad
in rags and banned by the unjust opinion of the
world, though he labored under the bitterest curse
that ever rose to the lips of an unjust, a passionate
parent, still would I wed him, banned and cursed,
though he were, aye, cheerfully and joyfully would
I wed him, and as Truth lives in heaven, I will
wed none
Hold, Marian, hold, for my sake! shrieked her
father, raising his attenuated hands, with a voice
that seemed prophetic of his anticipated homethe
graveMarian, pause for your father's sake!
The words died on the maiden's lip, the flush of
momentary excitement passed from her beaming
features, her eye lost its flashing glance, her form
its erect stature, her arm fell listlessly by her side,
and Marian forgot the vow of eternal constancy to
her lover, when she beheld, standing before her,
the weak and attenuated form of her father,
trembling
on the verge of the grave, with his eyes,
dimmed by disease, warmed into the momentary
glance that appealed with such silent eloquence to
the holiest feelings of a daughter's heart.
She sank weeping at his feet, and clasped his
withered hands, as she wept.
You will consent, my daughter? he whispered,
You will gratify your poor, fond father.
Marian murmured assent, and Major Tracy stood
regarding the father and daughter with a glance of
bitter mocking triumph as he muttered, Now this
brave son of mine shall know the man he has
defied
!
Wellwood shall have the bride and the lands,
and when the
rebel
has met his deserts, Wellwood
succeeds to the Earldom! Miss Waltham, he
continued aloud, I had well nigh forgot the object
of my errand hither. Lieutenant Wellwood Tracy
has just arrived, and with as little delay as may be,
after the fatigue of travel, will hasten to pay his
respects
to his fair bride!
CHAPTER THE FIFTH.
THE BRIDEGROOM.
A STATELY array of silver candelabra, placed on
the mantel, and containing tall formal wax candles,
threw a glaring light around the antiquated parlor,
with its massive mirrors, its Turkish carpeting, its
wainscoted walls, adorned with paintings, its old
fashioned sofa, and high backed mahogany chairs.
A young man of some twenty-three years, attired
in the uniform of an officer in the British dragoons,
lay extended on the sofa in an attitude of the most
elegant disorder; with his legs enveloped in
Hessian
boots, shining with spurs and spattered with
mud, very easily crossed one over the other; his
head with its powdered locks resting upon one arm,
while with his face to the ceiling he seemed
intently
engaged in examining the merits of his chapeau,
with its mass of feathers, which his other hand
held poised directly over his face. He was not an
unhandsome man, but there was an air of
effeminacy
about his small, delicate features, and the jaunty
air of every position assumed by his slender and
well proportioned figure, that gave you an idea you
stood in the presence of the fashionable fop, the
man of the world of idlers, the dawdler at ladies'
elbows, the talker of small sayings, the coiner of
compliments, and smatterer of little pieces of all
kinds of knowledge, which combined together form
what the mass calls
a
gentleman, always provided
the combination of so many rare qualities is well
dressed.
And Wellwood Tracy was no dull fellow either.
A few summers at Oxford had given him some
idea of the existence of Greek and Latin, and he
was sufficiently acquainted with them to know that
these words meant languages, not celebrated
philosophers
;
a winter in London, passed amid the
excitement of balls,
routes, soirees
, and the
thousand
other assemblages of the gay world, had given
him some idea of life, and instilled into his mind
that fashionable code of morals, which places the
winning of a game at cards, and the destruction of
a woman's virtue, on a scale of perfect equality in
the list of innocent pleasures and venial sins; what
with all these acquirements, and a genteel way of
saying large oaths and dainty imprecations,
Lieutenant
Wellwood Tracy was voted by the world in
general, and his messmates in particular, to be a
deuced clever fellow, a finished gentleman, in every
way worthy of succeeding to the Earldom of
Wallingford
,
in case the intermediate heirs should
happen
to vacate this scene of trial and care.
The Lieutenant had just counted each feather in
3
his chapeau for the twelfth time, when the door
opened, and a servant informed him that his
chamber
was ready for his use, where he might remove
from his person the dust, disorder and dishabille of
travel.
Now for my bridal robeslisped the gallant
dragoon, as he tumbled from the sofa into an erect
position. I wonder where that cursed
valet
of
mine is staying all the time? What detains the
village priest? Wellwell (looking at his watch)
it's near the hour, and I've just time to dress. A
fellow can be married but onceit's best to submit
with a good grace, so here goes for the mysteries of
the toiletand then she's handsome and rich, and
I may one day be Earl of Wallingford!
Disappointment is the great misery of life
success
the great blessing. Which of the twain shal
be the lot of the gallant Lieutenant Wellwood Tracy
of His Majesty's dragoons?
CHAPTER THE SIXTH.
THE VALLEY OF THE WISSAHIKON.
When
Harry Heft left the farm-house of the
Quaker, in obedience to the invisible signal, the new
moon, with its delicate crescent of silver, poised in
the clear azure of the western horizon, was
shedding
around over the woods and stream of the
Wissahikon
,
a shower of softened light, which danced
on the prominent points of the foliage, sparkled
along the rivulet, and waved in threads of radiance
through the open glades and shadowed recesses of
the forest.
Having passed through the small garden, around
the farm-house, the young soldier brushed aside
the grass of the meadow heavy with dew, and
pursued
his way toward the Wissahikon, which rolled
along the vale, with the soft musical murmur of
water, sweeping along a pebbled bottom, and gave
its thousand tiny ripples, and delicate wavelets to
the brightening kiss of the moonbeams.
Well, may I die the death of a spy
exclaimed
Harry as he reached the banks of the stream,
and gazed aroundMay I die the death of a riglar
built renegate, if this aint purty. I never did see
my native stream look so nice aforeand now that
I think of it, I'd like to visit my old folks; but I
haint got time. I must git that purty gal out of
the clutches o' them Britishers at Major Tracy's,
and then I kin sit down and play if I like, but not
afore. But where in the name of the Continental
Congress is that feller Dennis? Dennis
O'Dougherty
,
McDermott, McDonough, McDaniel, Mac
Mac Divil! answered a voice from a clump of
elder bushes, within arm's-reach of Heft. And is
it callin' a man, dacent and civil, out o' his name,
at this solemn hour of the night, ye are, ye
spalpayn
?
Is this yer pe'liteness, Harry Heft
continued
the voice, as the bushes rustled, and a small
round face, with a very small, and very bright pair
of gray eyes, long upper lip and short nose,
emerged from the foliage. Is this yer pe'liteness I
say? I'm ashamed of ye, Harry Heft.
The face gradually rose from among the bushes,
and presently a tall, stout figure, clad in the uniform
of the Black Rangers, leaped out on the turf, and
in an instant was at the side of Harry Heft.
I'm ashamed of ye, Harry Heftsaid the
Irishman
,
with a grave look, and with a merry sparkle
in his eye. By the ghost of Fin-ma-coul, of St.
Patrick, St. Pater, and a half dozen more of the
rispictible old jontlemen, who raised petaties in ould
Erin afore the curse of Cromwell and King George
was put upon her sod, I'm ashamed of ye, Harry
Heftthere now ye pesky critter, he continued,
for long residence among the people of the
northern
Provinces had spiced the brogue of Dennis
McDermott
,
with a little dash of the Yankee dialect.
There now ye pesky critter ye, are ye satisfied?
Harry burst into a peal of laughter, and exclaimed
between the bursts of merriment
Look here, Irish, somebody must a-been drying
your primin' before a hickory fireyou go off at
sich very short notice. Why you explode at about
the eighth fraction of half-cock. Why, Irish,
you're gitting quite animatedif you'd
only
take
a'ter me something might be made out of you. You
are
a reg'lar old boy!
Jest call me by me christen name, Dennis, will
ye? Or pr'aps ye'd like yer picter spilt?
No, thank'ee, not jist now, replied Harry,
catching the quiet twinkle of the warm-hearted
Irishman's eye. But come along, Dennis. Let's
ford the creek and pass on; we've got about a mile
to go, and the sooner we're movin' the better.
The Rangers waded the stream, which was not
more than breast high, at this point, and taking a
beaten track on the western side, proceeded
southward
at as rapid a pace as might be. After about
five minutes walking under the shade of the wood,
the path emerged into an open field, covered with
blackberry bushes, brambles, and wild vines,
trailing
along the ground, with heaps of newly cut
timber, scattered along the surface of the
uncultivated
earth. The field was passed and the Rangers
arrived at a spot of singular beauty.
The Wissahikon entered a deep ravine or glen, if
either of these names are appropriate, where the
banks arose by an ascent in some places gradual, in
other points abrupt, into high and massive hills,
clothed from the sparkle of the ripple, to the deep
blue of the sky, with most luxuriant trees, with
foliage faintly dyed by autumn, of every gradation
of fantastic outline of form, every variety of light
and shade. Here swelling into pyramids of leaves,
silvered by the moonbeams; there sloping away
into shady nooks: at one point sweeping down to
one brooklet by a gentle descent of chestnut trees,
in all the towering height of a century's growth,
succeeded by tender saplings, whose leaves were
interwoven with those of many a green shrub and
verdant bush growing by the water side, and
dashing
their verdure in the waves of the deep, clear,
mirror-like flood; at another point, circuling around
some perpendicular mass of rock, whose clefts were
green with many a wild vine, the foliage sank
suddenly
down, with a leaf here and there touched by
the moonlight, while all the rest was dark and
indistinct
.
The stream, winding through the glen, with its
deep and rippleless waters of glassy clearness,
reflected
the ascending steeps on either side, and the
small space of the clear blue sky which these
heights, viewed from the vale below, permitted to
be seen, with so faithful an outline, and such a
delicate
mass of hues and tints, lights and shades, that
it seemed as though the landscape beneath the
waters
was an ideal and spiritual copy of the real and
living landscape above.
The path which our Rangers pursued, led along
the water's edge, and wound among the colossal
trunks of wide-branching oaks, whose roots had
been striking deep, and whose limbs had been
growing stronger for hundreds of years. As they
wended along with the silver murmur of the stream
filling the air, and the soft moonlight floating amid
the waving foliage, the Rangers for a time, under
the influence of the holy silence of the hour,
ceased all conversation, and with their footfalls
echoing along the wood, and the occasional
rustling
of leaves as they brushed through a mass of
shrubbery opposing their path, they pursued their
way, until the murmuring of a waterfall told them
of their vicinity to Rittenhouse's mill, a massive
stone building, which rose in strong relief with its
grey walls, standing boldly out against the
background
of verdure, while a number of cottages
barns and outhouses were scattered around it on the
eastern side of the artificial cascade.
The Rangers paused for a moment upon a
shelving
rock, and looked back into the lovely glen,
which they were about to leave.
Och, comrid, Harry Heft, said the Irishman,
breaking the silence which had lasted for a quarter
of an hour. Sure this beautiful spot, with its
feathery trees, and soft moonlight, and its quietness
and
su
lemnity, brings to mind the place ov me
birth, wid the little hut, and its green turf on the
bank of the Lake Killarney! The curse o' God be
on the tyrant who driv me frum me home! Is it
blubberin' ye are, Harry Heft?
The young American Ranger certainly showed
no signs of weeping, but Dennis merely meant the
insinuation as an excuse for the tear which stole
from his own eyelid, and washed his scarred and
sunburnt cheek.
What did the British drive you from your
home for? exclaimed Harry, participating in the
Irishman's outburst of long-hidden sympathies.
Ye've seen a tear in my eye, Harry Heft, and
you may as well make a note ov it; for none 'ill
you iver see there agin. The why and wharefore
I left me native country is a long story, Harry Heft;
but ye must know Harry, that meself and me
mother
,
and the wife and the childer, (not forgetting
the pig, be jabers,) lived in the nate little shealing
on the banks of the Killarney, and not a care did
we know, mair be token we had plenty of petaties,
until the red coated Britishers came and meddled
wid a little still of me own
Still?
Whiskey still? inquired Henry.
The same. A little bit ov a hand machine to
manyfactur' the poteen, ye know. The sodjers
came, and we hade a taste ov a ruction, and I giv
one of the rascals the `unlucky blow,' not maneing
it at all, at all; but flattened out he was, and it was
I that did it.
You sarved him right! Confound the
Britishers
,
I say!
Amen to that. And then they gave me the
choice of the gallows or the dragoon's saddle, for
they saw I was a stout, tall felley (fellow) of me
inches, and I chosed the gallows. But the wife
clung to my bosom, and the childer clung to me
knees, and pursuaded wid their tears that sed so
much more than words, to 'list, sooner than be
hanged, and 'list I did, sorrow to me soul! And I've
never seen wife or childer since.
The Irishman brushed a tear from his eye, and
Harry was seized with a sudden fit of whistling.
Aye! Whistle, Harry, whistle! It's better to
whistle nor to weep, and if I didn't laugh sometimes
my heart 'ud break for the grief that's tugging at it.
Ochone, Erin MavourneenI'm making a judy of
meself.
How long is it since ye listed, Dennis!
Ten years or thereabouts. We came to
Montreal
,
and seen some service among the French and
Injins, and on one occashun, a party of us dragoons
were dispatched all the way to Detroit, and the
3*
whole kit ov us, barrin' two others besides meself,
were riddled by the red skinned Injins. We three
survivors picked up our bones and walked off about
our business, each on his own pertikler way, for
we didn't see any necessity of our returning to
Montreal
and the barracks, or pushing on to Detroit
with its wild cats and Injins.
And then you pushed eastward and settled
down about Germantown here?
And here I've lived and wrought for near five
years, until Captain Tracy, and a likely boy he is
too, tipped me the wink, and then I followed him
to the wars, and maybe I haven't been a bad thorn
in the side of the Britishers?
A regular splinter in their sore-foot, as one
might say. But should any of your former
comrades
see you agin, think they'd know you?
It's difficult for meself to tell. But 'sposin'
they did see me and knew me, and had me in their
clutches at the same identical time; it's my candid
opinion they'd give me a pine coffin, and a dozen
bullets. The more shame to 'em and their king,
and the whole posse of 'em, by the blessed St.
Pathrick.
Well, now look here `Irish'I call you that
'cause it sounds more sociable than DennisI owe
you a life for a savin' mine at the rumpus of
Brandywine
.
And now by the Lord above us, if the
Britishers ever catch hold of you, and I don't
rescue
you, or if they harm you, and I don't avenge
you, then may I never know what it is to die a
soldier's
death, but die the pitiful death of a spy!
That's swor' to, Irish continued the
good-hearted
soldier as he grasped the Irishman's hand and
gave it a hearty shake. And now let's be off;
You know our Captain told us to pay a visit to his
father's house, and recon'itre, and then bring him
word, but I've a notion of puttin' an end to this
marriage somehow or other, and bringin' him word
of that too, before he heard it was in progress.
Sure, Harry Heft, ye didn't tell me of any
marriage
.
Be jabers I'm all in the dark
But come along. Let's ford the creek at the
falls, here, and travel down toward the Paper Mill,
and I'll tell you on the way!
Fording the stream, they passed along a road on
the eastern side of the Wissahikon for about a
quarter
of a mile, until the waters of the Paper Mill
Run came plunging into its bosom, from a height
covered with the buildings and out-houses
pertaining
to a large mill. Pursuing the course of the
rivulet, which at this point takes a sudden bend to
the west on its way to the Schuylkill, after fifteen
minutes had elapsed, they arrived at a spot, where
a perpendicular wall of rocks arises from the
opposite
and northern shore of the stream, clothed in
every cleft and spacious crevice with giant pines,
some growing out from the rock in a horizontal
direction
,
others slanting upward, others bending
crosswise, and with every giant pine, however
fantastical
in form, flinging its branches out into the
moonlight, from the straight and steep ascent of the
cliff.
Do you see that barricade of rocks, Irish?
Be jabers, a nateral fortriss!
Upon the top of that mass of rock, is concealed
as pretty a mansion as ever your eye rested upon.
That's Major Tracy's house, and we ascend to it by
a winding road. We cross over the stream on these
steppin' stones. The entrance to this road is
concealed
among the bushes yonder. It begins
somewhere
below this tremendous wall. I have it.
They entered the bushes, and presently were
journeying along a road, worn by horses' feet, that
wound round the precipice, affording an easy,
though somewhat sudden ascent to the platform of
earth at the summit. Presently they emerged from
under the shade of the pine trees, and stood upon
the turf of a green lawn, fenced round the edge of
the precipice with the interlacing trunks of the
pines, forming a natural protection, against the
dangers
of the steep, with their branches entwined
through each other, crossed and re-crossed, and
woven together, so thickly and densely, as to give
an observer the idea, that what he beheld was the
work of man's art, rather than a feat of nature.
CHAPTER THE SEVENTH.
THE BRIDAL PARTY.
In
the centre of the lawn arose the substantial
stone mansion of Major Tracy, a building of some
magnitude, overshadowed by a towering sycamore
that grew in the garden behind the house, and
rising
in all the strength and grandeur of ages, threw
its leaning trunk over the gabled roof, while its far
reaching branches, bursting out on every side, clad
with a thick and luxuriant foliage, afforded a
pleasant
and agreeable defence from the rigor of the sun
in the heat of summer, and now, as the moon sank
below the horizon, enveloped the edifice and the
lawn in its vicinity in deepest shadows. The
darkness
was broken by long lines of light streaming
from the half-closed shutters of the chamber
looking
out upon the portico which fronted the verdant
grass, and extended along the entire front of the
mansion.
Now keep your eyes about you, Irish,
exclaimed
Harry, as he glanced hurriedly round at
the spacious mansion and the range of out-buildings.
By the Continental Congress, if I aint very much
mistaken, them lights, flashing from the windows,
out upon the porch, have a tale of their own to tell.
Let's reccini'tre, Irish.
Be St. Pathrick! what's that? muttered
Dennis
in a tone of suppressed wonder, as they
approached
the porch. Do ye see anything there,
my darlint crittur?
Harry Heft followed the finger of the Irishman
with his eye, and discovered, fastened by their
bridle
reins to a pillar of the portico, two gallant
steeds, whose trappings, the ornamented saddle
cloth and the holsters, all showed that their riders
were at least military men, if not officers of rank
and authority.
With hushed breath and cautious step, Harry
Heft stole along the floor of the portico toward the
window shutters from whence emerged the light,
and which reached from the roof of the portico to
the floor. Each window served the purposes of a
door, as well as a medium for the admittance of
daylight. Gazing through the crevice of the
shutters
the
sashes opened after the fashion of folding
doors, being thrown backHarry Heft beheld a
scene which he regarded with evident wonder and
astonishment, although he had anticipated
something
of the kind.
The apartment within was spacious, large, and
furnished after the fashion of some sixty years
since. It was lighted by a chandelier, filled with
stately candles of wax, and suspended from the
stuccoed ceiling. In the centre of the apartment
with his back turned to the window, stood a portly
man, with a very red, round face, a very brilliant
nose, and a very small mouth, and his ample figure
arrayed in the gown and surplice of a clergyman,
while his little fat hands, with short gouty fingers,
grasped a gilt edged book, from which he was
reading
.
It was the book of Common Prayer, and he
read the marriage ceremony. In front of him
were the bridegroom and bride; on one side stood
Major Tracy, with a settled frown on his brow: a
spacious arm-chair on the opposite side contained
the form of the invalid Squire Waltham, who gazed
with a half vacant, half imbecile stare upon the
company around. At his elbow stood a gentleman
of some fifty winters, attired in the undress of a
colonel in the British army, and with an
impressive
countenance, marked by the lines of care and
thought. He was named Colonel Musgrave, and
he held the baton of command over the fortieth
regiment. The arrival of this gentleman had been
somewhat late and hurried, for his boots were
bespattered
with mud, and his entire costume was
marked by the unfinished and disarranged air that
attends a journey undertaken and executed in haste.
Opposite to this gentleman, and forming the right
wing of the circle, was a young gentleman, attired
as a cornet in the dragoon service of his Majesty's
th regiment, and with a face and air expressive
of nothing in especial, except a very apparent
desire
to play as critical a part in his capacity of
right wing of the picture, as his disordered dress
and soiled boots would possibly admit.
The bridegroom, arrayed in a lustrous coat of
snow white silk, with small clothes and stockings
to match, buckles of shining silver, and square toed
shoes, seemed disposed to do particular justice to
his situation as a prominent point of the picture.
Halting on his left leg, with the right advanced, he
extended one delicate white hand, sparkling with
rings, to the bride, displaying all the beauty and
finish of the ruffle at his wrist in the action, while
his other hand was disposed very gracefully, with
the little finger deposited in a fold of his snow white
and gaudily embroidered vest, as with his head
erect, and his powdered hair flowing in graceful
folds over his shoulder, Lieutenant Wellwood Tracy
looked straight forward over the head of the clerical
gentleman, and a complacent expression mantled
over his face, which seemed to intimate that he
considered himself a very fine point of the picture
indeed, and worthy of the pencil of a Vandyke, or
a Godfrey Kneller.
The whole scene was a mockery of a solemn
sacrifice, but the victim destined to be offered up
at the altar, appeared in all the splendor of her
queenly beauty even at that dread hour, when the
utterance of a few simple words, and the
transposition
of a ring, would place her destiny in the hands
of one, for whom she cared little, and of whom she
knew less, and sever her fate from the silken cord
that entwined it with the destiny of him, whom
she loved with all the purity and self devotion of a
maiden passion.
The golden hair, unconfined by band or cincture,
fell in a shower of waving tresses over her robes
of white, down to her very waist; while with
head drooped low, and eyes downcast, the maiden,
scarce knowing what she did, tendered her hand
cold as the marble of a statueto her gallant
bridegroom
,
and muttered the responses of the ceremony
with a vacant manner and absent air, as though her
mind wandered amid the shadowy creations of a
dream.
Harry Heft beheld the scene at a glance, and as
he gazed, he became instinctly aware of the
relative
positions of the parties.
He had scarce time to think of some means of
delivering the fair maiden, when the marriage
ceremony reached the point, near its
accomplishment
,
where the least binding words are said, and
the ring is placed upon the finger of the bride. At
this moment Harry felt some one pressing against
his shoulder, and a face touching his own, while
his quick ear caught the sound of suppressed
breathing
.
He turned his head aside, whisperingHist!
Dennis! when a hand, placed over his mouth,
hushed the exclamation of sudden surprise that was
bursting from his lips, and he beheld the face of
Herbert Tracy gazing over his shoulder with his lip
compressed and his eye flashing, as he regarded the
marriage scene within the apartment.
Every lineament of his countenance was
impressed
with an expression so strange, so dread, so
unreal and fearful in its character, that the Ranger
scarce might recognize the face of his Leader in
that high forehead all seamed by deep wrinkles,
and relieved by the hair, thrown wildly aside from
the countenance; the full, black eye, glaring from
beneath the eyebrows; the lips compressed as
fixedly
and firmly as those of a chiselled statue; and the
lines of each cheek so clearly marked with the
settled
appearance that betokens powerful yet
suppressed
emotion, and the entire visage, with every
outline, shown in the boldest relief, by the glaring
light which streamed from the chandelier within
the apartment, seemed so much changed and altered,
that Harry Heft only knew his captain from the
simple reason, that it were impossible to forget one
lineament of the face and features that he had
known and looked upon from earliest childhood.
Harry felt his hand grasped by that of his
leader, with a quick, hurried, but expressive
movement
As God lives, stand by me! whispered the
captain.
As God lives, I will, to the death! returned
the soldier in as deep a whisper.
With this ring thee I wedexclaimed the
bridegroom within the apartment, as, bending aside
with a most graceful bow, he took the fair hand of
Marian in his own, and with a delicate movement
of the thumb and forefinger of his right hand,
proceeded
to place the marriage ring on the ivory
finger of the maiden. The gold had touched the
finger of Marian, and every eye was fixed upon the
twain; Major Tracy smiled grimly as he viewed
the accomplishments of his scheme; the invalid
father looked up into the face of his daughter; the
eyes of the clerical gentleman wandered from his
book; and even the face of the colonel, as well as
the cornet, betrayed some interest in the matter; the
ring, I say, had touched, but not encircled the finger,
when a rushing sound was heard, a hurried
footstep
,
and the tall form of Herbert Tracy stood
between
the bridegroom and bride, the ring was
dashed on the floor, and Wellwood Tracy was
hurled aside by a blow from the scabbard of the
captain's sword.
She is mine! Mine before God and Heaven!
exclaimed Herbert, as Marian fell in his arms, with
a shriek and a glance of wild rapture, that told of
recognition. Mine before God and Heaven!
This for the man that shall say me nay!
Unsheathing his sword with his good right hand,
he gathered the fainting maiden to his bosom with
his other hand, and glanced around upon the bridal
party, like a noble stag at bay, as he retired one step
toward the window.
Had some sudden and fearful spell fallen upon
the stern Major Tracy, the invalid Waltham, the
round faced parson, the sedate colonel, the smooth
faced cornet, or the silken bridegroom, they could
not, each and all of them, have formed more finished
and perfect statues of surprise than they did for a
single instant after Herbert had burst into the room.
Had a column of fire shot upwards from the floor;
had a thunder bolt severed the ceiling, and scattered
its rays of death at their feet; had the mansion
been rocked by the heavings of an earthquake, the
bridal party, it is very probable, would have been
somewhat surprised, if not thunderstricken; but
here was column of fire, thunder bolt, and
earthquake
all combined in one form, and that form the
figure of the gallant Ranger. I trow the bridal
party were more than surprised.
Herbert Tracy took advantage of this first instant
of speechless astonishment, and pressing his
betrothed
closer to his bosom, strode with a hurried,
yet even step toward the windowMine she is
before God and Heaven! he criedmine by all
that is good and hallowed! Mine by her plighted
trothmine by her vows of love! he continued,
reaching the window, and extending his sword,
while, with a bitter sneer on his lip, he glanced
around the roomAnd think ye I will surrender
my claim to any man that lives? Curses may be
heaped upon my head by him, whom I am bound
to name my father, and death and ruin may stand
in my path, but stillby the Lord that lives
Herbert Tracy will not show himself unworthy of
his name! A merry even to you, gentlefolks!
Emerging from the window, he rushed across
the porch, and stood beside the steeds that had so
lately borne the colonel and the cornet to the bridal
party, but which were now held ready for
mounting
,
by Dennis at one bridle rein, and Harry at the
other.
Mount, capt'in, mountcried HarryThey
're comin'they're comin'! Mount, and away
down the Paper Mill Run road! Push for the
Quaker's farm house! Mount, by the Continental
Congress, mount!
Ere Harry had finished his favorite expletive,
Herbert had sprang upon the stoutest of the steeds,
and with the fainting Marian in his arms, struck
for the road that led around the rock down to the
Wissahikon.
Now's your time, Dennis? If you've any
sperrit in your lazy bones, mount that horse by the
stable yonderI'll mount this! Hurray, boy, for
your neck's in danger! Now then cried the
gallant trooper as he sprang upon the cornet's
horse, and enveloped his form in the blanket that
hung at the saddle bownow then, `Irish,' strike
for Rittenhouse's Mill, right across the fields
they'll mistake the fluttering of this blanket for the
young lady's dress. Take the fields for it, and
lead 'em on a wrong scent. By the Continental
Congress
Yes, be jabers! shouted Dennis. Will it
plase your leddyshep to rid the laste bit closer to
me! Och, darlin'! Whoop!
And off they went, like mad devils as they were,
the sound of their horses' hoofs echoing far around,
and the white blanket of Harry Heft fluttering in
the moonlight, like the robe of an uneasy spirit,
amusing itself with a midnight ride.
The sounds of the horses' hoofs roused the
astonished
bridal party from the spell of surprise, and
with one assent, they rushed out on the portico,
leaving the invalid in her arm-chair.
Call the servantsshouted the Colonel
Wilson, I saywhere's that lazy trooper!
There he goes! muttered the enraged
Lieutenant
Tracy with an oath, as he ran from one end
of the porch to the other; there he goes down
the Wissahikonby the Gs!
I ra-yther think they've taken a cut across
the fe-eld, Lev'tenant, lisped the cornet, smiling
at the idea of telling the whole story at the mess
table. There they go!
How
her dwess
does
flutt
aw
, he continued, as the white blanket met his
eye.
Without a word, without an exclamation of
surprise
,
did Major Tracy assemble the domestics, and
rouse the trooper, who was sleeping on a
wheelbarrow
near the stable door, under the influence of
plentiful potations. A short and hurried council
was held; men were despached to the stables at a
hundred yards distance, to saddle other horses;
some started on foot in pursuit of the fugitives; but
amid all their conversation, their imprecations, and
their vows of vengeance, the ears of the bridal
party
were saluted with the sound of the retreating
hoofs, echoing from the grounds north of the
mansion
,
to the road on the east, and from the road,
through the woods to the grounds again.
Full ten minutes elapsed ere horses could be
saddled
for the major, the colonel, the cornet, and
the lieutenant; and the oaths and imprecations
of the three latter did not by any means tend to
increase the speed of the domestics in their
employment
.
Scour the country in every direction! shouted
the colonel, as he beheld his companions mounted,
together with the half sober trooper and three of
the domestics. The fugitives cannot pass the
British lines without alarming the picquets! This
side of the lines they're in our power! Cornet,
you will join me, with that drunken lout yonder, in
pursuing the rebel captain across the field. Major,
perhaps it would be best for you and the lieutenant
to take the Wissahikon road. We can traverse the
country in different directions, and meet at
Rittenhouse's
mill.
Major Tracy nodded assent.
Look ye, sirs, he exclaimed to the three stout
fellows, who, with pistols in their hands, were
mounted on strong fleet horses by his side. Look
'ye, sirsshould ye come across the fugitives, be
careful that you do not harm the lady in white,
Miss Waltham. You are all good marksmenI'll
make the man of you comfortable for life who
shall pick the rebel officer in black from his horse!
Mark 'yehe is a traitor, and deserves no quarter!
Away!
And as they galloped away in various directions,
one of the frightened female domestics, a weak and
aged woman, entered the scene of the late bridal
ceremony, and beheld the clerical gentleman, on
his knees, before Mr. Waltham, who was still
seated in his armed-chair, with his head fallen to
one side, his eyes closed, and his lips parted. The
clergyman was engaged in chafing the hands of the
invalid, and the servant drew nearer, and looked
over his shoulder into the face of the sick man, and
started back with a cry of horror, as she discovered
the ghastly paleness of his cheeks, the blue livid
circles around his eyes, and the sunken eye-sockets.
His spirit had gone from the scenes of marrying
and giving in marriage, from the scenes of man's
passions, and man's wrong to his fellow, from his
daughter, his lands and his gold, up to that
Tribunal
that knows no earthly passion or prejudice,
therein the solemn words of the Sacred Book
To give account of the deeds done in the body.
4
CHAPTER THE EIGHTH.
THE PURSUIT.
When
Herbert Tracy flung himself upon the
steed of the British Colonel, and planting his spurs
into the sides of the plunging animal, forced him
to take the steep and winding road that led around
the precipice, a thousand feelings rushed through
his mind, and a wild tumult of opposing thoughts
agitated his brain, but amid all the contending
feelings and opposing thoughts, one idea was
uppermost in his mind, a steady, firm and
unalterable
resolve to bear his betrothed away to some
scene of safety, and a desperate purpose to part
with his life, ere the beautiful being, whose head
now lay pillowed on his breast, should be torn
from his embrace, by the rude hands of those who
had, so mockingly, toyed with her plighted vows.
Winding his arm yet closer around the waist of
Marian, he dashed down the narrow path, plunged
into the Wissahikon, and ascending the opposite
bank, gained the rocky road, which pursued its
irregular course along the banks of the stream. As
he flew along the road with the speed of wind,
the fresh and breezy night air, fanning the pallid
cheek of the maiden, awoke her to consciousness,
and Herbert felt the warm beating of her heart,
throbbing against the hand which held her to his
side.
She opened her beaming blue eyes, and as the
warm flush of youth and love again glowed on her
swelling cheek, she cast a hurried glance around,
as though she essayed to recall her wandering
thoughts, and then while the whole truth flashed
upon her, she wound her arms with a quick,
convulsive
movement, around the neck of her lover, her
bosom rose and fell in the moonlight, and sinking
her head upon his manly breast, she found relief
from the tumult of opposing thoughts, in a flood of
tears.
Herbert gazed upon her fair face with its beauty
half upturned to the sky, and if ever, during his
wild and dreamy life, he felt his soul swell with
the feeling of intense happiness, and every nerve
thrill with delight, it was at that moment, when
her full and lustrous orbs were cast upward, with a
glance so full of high and hallowed love, so full
of all the trustfulness of woman's passion, and
beaming with that winning confidence, unmodified
by mistrust or doubt, which the vilest of mankind
would hesitate to wrong or betray.
The sounds of pursuit broke upon the air.
Herbert
had attained the point, where the Paper Mills
cast a lengthened shadow over the stream, and a
quarter of a mile lay before him ere he could
reach Rittenhouse's Mill. It was his purpose to
avoid his pursuers, to seek the farm house of the
Quaker, Joab Smiley, place his betrothed in safety
till the morrow, then repass the British lines by the
bed of the Wissahikon, and reach the Haunted
House by midnight. Marianthought Herbert
might remain concealed in the farm house, with
entire safety, until the coming day, when the fate
of battle would enable him to place her in a
situation
of greater security.
The sounds of pursuit, the echoing of the horses'
hoofs and the shouts of the pursuers broke louder
and nearer upon the stillness of night, and sinking
the rowels into the flanks of his steed, Herbert gave
him free rein, and in an instant the noble barb
dashed along the road, with the monotonous beat of
the hoof upon the sod, betokening the utmost
stretch of his speed put to the test.
A hundred yards lay between Herbert and
Rittenhouse's
Mill, and a hundred yards behind his
pursuers came thundering along the road. The
report of a pistol broke upon the air, and a bullet
whistled by Herbert's ear, at the same moment that
the voice of his father, urging the pursuit, rose
high above all other sounds.
Ononlet him not escape with life! Let
your aim be sure, and the bullet certain of its
mark! Onward, my brave men, onward!
I will foil them yet! Herbert muttered
between
his teeth, as he recognized the tones of his
father's voice. Here is Rittenhouse's Millthe
moon has gone down, and the night is dark,now
God help me!
As the exclamation rose upon his lips, the
sound of horses' hoofs which rose in his rear, were
echoed by similar sounds on the opposite bank of
the stream, and the crashing of brushwood and the
rustling of branches, gave Herbert warning, that his
escape was cut off beyond the Mill.
The crisis came. The Mill was reached, the
party on the opposite side came thundering through
the woods, and the voice of Major Tracy was heard,
nearer and yet more near; when, reining his steed
up against a small and perpendicular rock which
peeped out from among a mass of brushwood,
Herbert
loosened his feet from the stirrups, and
gathering
his arm around the waist of Marian, with a
firmer embrace, sprang from the horse, on to the
rock, amid the shelter of the environing shrubbery,
and as he sprang, the affrighted horse bounded
forward
,
dashed through the stream, swept up the
road that traversed the opposite hill, and with the
speed of a bolt, driven from the bow, disappeared
in the shade of the wood.
As he disappeared, the party of Col. Musgrave
emerged from the woods on the opposite bank into
the stream. Almost at the very same instant
Major Tracy with his men; rushed along with the
speed of lightning, within an arm's reach of the
spot upon which Herbert stood, and passing between
the rock and the Mill, dashed into the Wissahikon,
and ere he was aware he confronted the colonel
and his company in mid-stream.
Which way went the fugitives? shouted Col.
Musgrave.
Do you not hear the horses' hoofs upon the
hill? replied the stern and commanding voice of
Major Tracyaway! away! We triflewe
lose time! away!
We'll have them now, by  exclaimed
the voice of Lieutenant Wellwood. They
cannot
be more than fifty yards ahead! Now for't
my men!
And with one assent the pursuers joined their
forces, and galloping up the opposite bank of the
stream in the direction taken by the steed which
Herbert had just abandoned, their forms were lost
in the shades of the forest, and the echoing of
their horses' hoofs, began to grow fainter on the
air.
Herbert had well calculated his address and
dexterity, combined with an intimate acquaintance
with the spot, when he took the sudden leap from
the saddle on to the rock, among the surrounding
brushwood. In his youthful ramblings near the
Mill, he had discovered a path, perhaps worn by
the feet of Indians, an age before, winding along
the nooks, the heights and recesses of the hills
forming the eastern bank of the stream. The
entrance to this path, within a few feet of the Mill,
was hidden by the branches of the trees mingling
with the light shrubbery, that grew upon the
perpendicular
rocks, separating the road from the
forest. In the moment of peril, the memory of
the rock and the secret path flashed upon his mind,
and in an instant, he availed himself of the
remembrance
,
and eluded pursuit in the very crisis of the
chase.
As the sounds of the pursuing party came
softened
and almost hushed by distance to the ears of
the lovers, Herbert gave Marian the support of his
arm, and they threaded their way along the
winding
path through the woods, until they emerged
upon the meadow sloping from farmer Smiley's
house, down to the Wissahikon. Approaching
the farm house, they found they had been
preceded
by Harry Heft and his friend Dennis, who
it seems had succeeded in persuading the Quaker
to receive the betrothed of Herbert, under the
shelter of his roof, for a few days until the fortune
of war might enable the lovers to unite their fates
beyond danger of separation. After he had seen
Marian safe under the peaceful roof, and attended
by the care of the young Quakeress, Herbert
departed
from the farm house, with a promise to
return at the earliest moment that might afford an
opportunity. Dennis and Harry proceeded to take
their way to the Wissahikon on their return to the
American lines, in another direction from that
taken by Herbert, who paused an instant on the
banks of the stream, ere he plunged into the
recesses
of the woods, and as he looked back upon
the quiet home of the Quaker farmer sleeping in
the starlight, a fearful presentiment crossed his
mind, that he should never gaze upon his betrothed
againthat some dire and hidden calamity was
hovering over their paththat some dread and
overwhelming evil, was even now gathering
blackness
upon the horizon of their sky, and would
suddenly burst over their heads, and crush every
fair prospect of their life, every bright hope of
their existence under its blightning influences.
Come what willsaid Herbert, in a voice
that was uttered not to the air, but to his own
heart, come what will, my resolve is taken.
My hand and sword shall be raised, first in defence
of the hills and vales of this fair land of my birth;
and then in defence of the maiden, bound to me
by the solemn vows of our plighted troth. Death
may come, and ruin may threatenbut their
approaches
shall be met with
honor!
CHAPTER THE NINTH.
THE COUNCIL.
The
hills and vales of the Wissahikon slept in
the silence of midnight, when a solitary horseman
issued from the mass of forest trees, near the
Haunted House, and taking his way across an
intervening field, presently reined in his steed along
the front of the mansion.
It was a small, one storied building, marked by
a style of architecture which mingled the steep,
gable-ended roof of a cottage, with the high and
pointed windows of the Gothic order; while the
eves of the mansion were heavy with carved work,
the window frames were decorated with quaint
devices in wood, the numerous chimneys by which
it was surmounted seemed as much contrived for
ornament as use, and the general air and
appearance
of the place, indicated that it might have
been the abode of some wealthy admirer of the
country, who had here fixed himself a home amid
the solitude and shade of the woods. It was
situated
on a gentle eminence approached by steps of
stone, built in the grassy bank, and the limited lawn
which sloped from three sides of the picturesque
edifice, was terminated by a pleasant grove of
horse-chestnut trees, giving an air of seclusion to
the spot, while the ground in the rear was occupied
by a garden, once agreeably diversified with flowers,
but now overgrown and choked by weeds. The
edifice had, in fact, been the summer abode of a
wealthy English merchant of Philadelphia, who
was scared from its precincts by the noise and
confusion
of war. Deserted by its proprietor, the
mansion had fallen into partial decay, and was
alternately occupied by marauding parties of the
American and British armies, who not unfrequently
awoke the echoes of its quiet walls, with sounds of
mirth and revelry, which, perchance, was the
occasion
of its namethe Haunted Housethe songs
and yells of the drunken troopers being mistaken
by the surrounding farmers for the cries and shrieks
of spirits of the unreal world.
As the horseman halted in front of the Haunted
House, a figure, attired in the uniform of the Black
Rangers, advanced from the shade of the
horse-chestnut
trees, exclaiming
Well, Capt'in, is that you? Dennis and
Leftenant
Heft has just come inI was afeared
something
mought a-happened to you.
Aye, Sergeant, I am back again without harm
or injury. But tell mehas the
commander-in-chief
arrived? If my eyes do not deceive me,
those dusky masses, scattered across the fields
yonder
,
are the American troops, and the glimmer of
their arms in the starlight shows that they are
ready for action at a moment's warning.
Gineral Washington has arrivedreplied the
Sergeantand the Black Rangers are honored
with the post of `Guard around the Haunted
House.' But with regard to the information,
gathered to-night by the Rangers
Having been put in possession of this
information
,
Herbert sprung from his horse, and was
admitted by a sentinel into the front chamber of
the mansion, where a glaring light, burning upon
a large oaken table, discovered the figures of a
number of officers, of various ranks and grades,
attired in the blue and buff uniform of the
Continental
service.
It will be advisable to begin the attack before
sunrise to-morrow morningexclaimed the officer
who sat at the head of the table, as Captain Tracy
entered. This is the plan of battle agreed upon,
he continued, laying his hand upon an unrolled
chart which was spread open upon the tablethe
divisions of Generals Sullivan and Wayne, flanked
by the brigade of General Conway, will enter
the village of Germantown, and commence the
attack, with the light infantry of the enemy who
are posted at Allen's House, at some three miles
distance from this place.Ah! Captain Tracy, I
am glad to welcome you back; how have you
succeeded
in your mission?
Herbert proceeded as briefly as possible to relate
to the Commander-in-chief, the various facts in his
possession relative to the force, numbers, and
position
of the enemy.
The British line of encampment crosses the
village of Germantown at right angles, said
Herbert
,
near the centre. The left wing extends
from the main road, across the irregular and
inclosed
grounds of the various farmers, over the
Wissahikon along to the river Schuylkill. It is
covered in front, by mounted and dismounted
chasseurs, and the right which extends eastward
toward the Delaware, is defended in front by the
Queen's American Rangers and a battalion of
light infantry. The 40th regiment, under the
command of Lieutenant Col. Musgrave, is posted
nearly a mile in advance of the main line, between
Chew's House and Chestnut Hill, and a battalion
of light infantry, occupies the summit of the hill,
three miles in advance of this spot.
Your information, Captain Tracy, said the
Commander-in-chief, agrees, in every essential
point, with the data already in my possession. So,
gentlemen, our original plan of battle holds good.
While the divisions of Generals Wayne and Sullivan
enter the village by way of Chestnut Hill, the
divisions
of Greene and Stephens, flanked by
McDougall's
brigade, will take a circuit along the
Limekiln
Road, some two miles eastward from Chew's
House, and attack the enemy's right wing. The
militia of Maryland and New Jersey, under
command
of Generals Smallwood and Forman, will
march down the Old York Road, which lies three
miles to the east of the Limekiln Road, and engage
with the rear of the right. General Armstrong's
Pennsylvania brigade will attack the enemy's left
at Vanduring's Mill, at the junction of the
Wissahikon
with the Schuylkill. Think you, Captain
Tracy, that we shall be able to surprise the
enemy?
I think the movement might be effected with
care and celerity, your Excellency.
A shade of thought came over the noble brow of
the Commander-in-chief, and he leaned his head
musingly upon his hand for an instant.
Gentlemen, he exclaimed, after the pause of a
moment, I need not tell you that every thing
depends
upon the suddenness and secresy of our
movements
.
If we surprise the enemy, we shall
terminate
this disastrous war, and win the best of all
boons, our country's Independence; if the enemy
are on the alert, and ready to receive us, it is more
than probable that the superior discipline of his
troops will triumph over the irregular bravery and
undisciplined courage of a great portion of the
army which I have the honor to command. What
think ye, gentlemen?
And as each hardy veteran or brave aspirant
gave his opinion, the scene assumed an appearance
of interest, which told the deep and fixed
determination
of the American commanders, never to lay
down the swords which they had so gallantly
unsheathed
,
until the independence of their common
country was achieved.
The glaring light of the lamps, placed in the
centre of the oaken table, cast a ruddy glow upon
the faces and forms that clustered round the
Commander-in-chief
.
His face so calm, so mild, and
yet so full of that native dignity of expression,
which tells of a mind formed to rule, was shown
in the boldest light and strongest shade, as he
turned from one brave man to another, to receive
their opinions and suggestions on the coming
contest
.
There was the towering form, and bold and
open countenance of Wayne, whose sword-thrust
never failed, and whose charge mowed the enemy's
ranks, like the scathings of an earth-riven
thunderbolt
;
there was the gallant Knox, with his bluff,
honest visage, every line beaming good humor, and
dignified by an expression of determined courage;
there was the sagacious Greene, whose counsels
were as full of wisdom as his sword was sure, and
his mind clear and self-possessed in the hour of
mortal conflict; and there gathered around the man
upon whose shoulders heaven had placed the
destiny
of his country, were the brave men, who
flocked from every hill and vale of the continent,
from foreign lands, from the misrule of despotism
in every part of oppressed Europe, from the hearth
sides of their infancy, and the homes of their
manhood
,
and thronged in one gallant band around the
banner of freedom,there they stood with their
good swords that had tasted blood in many a battle
girded to their sides, with their noble visages
marked
by scars, and darkened by the toil and exposure
of battle, and with hearts as true and bold as ever
beat in the bosom of the most chivalric knight or
daring warrior of the age of gallant deeds and
generous
warfare.
And standing by the side of Washington, was a
young soldier, whose form was moulded with all
the symmetry of manly beauty, whose cheek was
yet warm with the bloom of early youth, and
whose piercing eye and high forehead, with its bold
outline, indicative of the highest order of mind,
gave rich promise of the mature man, whose words
of burning eloquence, were, in future years, to fall
like the revealings of a seer on the ears of his
countrymen
.
Washington, ever and anon, would incline his
head to Lieutenant Colonel Hamilton, and listen to
the suggestions he offered, with an interest of
which older men might have been proud, or invite
his opinion with an eagerness that showed how
strong a hold the young soldier had attained in the
heart of his commander. Little did the father of
his country think of the future fate of the aspiring
soldier! Little did he imagine that the youthful
form by his side, would survive the perils of war,
to die after the quietude of peace had succeeded to
the strife of battle, in an inglorious combat, the
fruit of a participation in the scenes of political
conflict!
The council lasted until an hour after midnight,
when the plan of operations for the succeeding day
being resolved upon, the various officers retired to
their different commands, to snatch such hasty
repose as the lateness of the hour might allow, and
to make such arrangements for the coming
conflict
as might tend to ensure success to the American
arms.
And under the broad canopy of Heaven,
unsheltered
from the dews and damps of the night air by
covering or tent, slept the brave soldiers of the
American host, as soundly, as securely, as though
the coming morn was to bring scenes of peace
and quietness, instead of the turmoil and bloodshed
of battle.
As Herbert Tracy stood gazing upon the scene
around, from the elevation of the Haunted House;
as his eye wandered from the vast dome of the
heavens
above, hung with a million stars, to the
landscape
,
with its hills covered with forests, its
cultivated
valleys, and its level fields, along which were
scattered the masses of the Continental army, the
thought of the coming contest, and the fearful
effects
it might produce, flashed like a meteor-light
across his mind.
How many a brave heart that now beats
warmly
,
will to-morrow night be cold and torpid under
the freezing touch of death! Many a noble form
will measure out the hasty grave of the battle field
many an eye will be dimmedmany a hand
stiffened, and many an arm unnervedbut come
success or come defeat, for me will remain the
same forbidding destiny, over my head will lower
the same dark cloud, heavy with the lightnings of
a father's curse!
BOOK THE SECOND.
CHEW'S HOUSE.
CHAPTER THE FIRST.
THE BATTLE MORN.
The
morning of Saturday, the 4th of October,
1777, dawned slowly and heavily; and the sky was
obscured by dimly defined masses of clouds and
mist, that overhung the pathway of the sun, and
extended, like one vast shroud, along the dome of
heaven, enveloping hill, and plain, and stream, in
the density of its folds.
Objects were not discernible at more than fifty
paces, and, not unfrequently, the weary eye of the
soldier in vain essayed to define the outline of
marching troops, opposing enclosures, brushwood
or trees, not more than twenty paces in front of
his path.
As the first glimmering of dawn began to steal
over the landscape, the American army resumed
their march, unmarked by the roll of drum or the
peal of trumpet. The only sounds that disturbed
the silence of the atmosphere were the monotonous
tread of men and horses, shaking the earth, like
the low moaning of far off thunder, and ever and
anon the words of command, uttered in a suppressed
tone of voice, passed along the line; and these
sounds, mingled with the jar of clanking swords,
the shrill neigh of the mettled war-horse, and the
thousand half subdued noises that accompany the
movements of a large body of armed men, were all
the tokens that served to warn the surrounding
farmers
and peasantry to flee from the scene of the
approaching conflict.
At the head of the central body, with Wayne on
one side and Sullivan on the other, rode the Man of
the Army, his tall form seeming yet more lofty, as
it loomed through the mist, and his face impressed
with an expression of solemn determination, as he
gave to his various aids-de-camp the orders of the
day, the directions regulating the march, or as he
imparted farther instructions in relation to the
attack
and surprise.
The deep and prolonged murmur and
half-suppressed
bustle, that was heard to the right and left
of the central body, served to show that the
divisions
of Greene and Stephen on the left wing, and
the militia of Maryland and Jersey on the extreme
left, as well as the brigade of Pennsylvania on the
extreme right, were defiling east and west, to take
their respective positions in the approaching
struggle.
As the central division advanced in regular order
over the fields, and through the woods, that lay
between
the Haunted House and Chestnut Hill, the
fog seemed to deepen, and the light of day served
only to render the gloom more apparent, and objects
around, more vague and shadowy.
The Black Rangers were some two hundred yards
in advance, and a quarter of a mile to the right of
the main body, on the look out for scouts and
foraging
parties of the enemy. They had arrived within
a mile of Chestnut Hill, and were ascending a
circular
elevation of earth, crowned with a thick
copse, when the quick ear of Harry Heft first
discerned
the sounds of laughter, the clank of swords,
and the pattering of horses' hoofs, on the opposite
side of the hill, beyond the woods.
With your permission, Captain, I'll jist ride up
to the top 'o th' hill and see what them suspicious
sounds might mean.
Do so, Lieutenant, replied Herbert. It
strikes me that your eye will discover some stray
foraging party who have lost their way in the fog.
Just approach near enough to ascertain their force
and positiondon't thrust yourself heedlessly into
danger.
And sure, Capt'in, exclaimed Dennis,
might n't it be jest as well for meself to ride to
the opposite side of the hill, in a different direction
from that taken by the Leftenant, and take a
dacent peep at the Britishersif Britishers they
be?
The Captain nodded assent, and while the party
halted, at some fifty paces from the copse at the
summit of the elevation, Harry Heft puts purs to
his horse, and galloped around the eastern side of
the ascent, while Dennis pursued his way toward
the western side.
Harry passed through the copse, and gained the
opposite brow of the hill, where, reining in his
steed, he tried to discover the nature of the ground.
Below him, for some twenty paces, the hill sloped
down in a gentle descent, and was then lost in the
obscurity of the fog, from the bosom of which, far
down in the valley, came drunken shouts, mingling
with snatches of songs, and the sound of horses'
hoofs.
Let's see, soliloquized Harry, where am I,
and what 's this place like? Ah! now I have it
this hill slopes down into a small valley, which it
encircles in the shape of a new moonand now
that I think of it, there is a level outlet from it
toward the south, opening into a flat bottomed
piece of swampy ground. On all other sides it is
circumvented by a semi-cerclar woods, and it strikes
me, them strangers, whoever they be, must be takin'
a frolic right in the lap of the hollow. By the
Continental
Congress, what's that?
The sound that attracted Harry's attention, was
the quick and sudden noise of horses' hoofs,
mingled
with vindictive shouts, as though their riders
were in close pursuit of an enemy. Nearer and
nearer the sounds of pursuit drew, and Harry was
about to obey the impulse of the moment and rush
down into the valley, when the jarring report of a
pistol broke upon the air, and the concussion lifted
the fog for some fifty paces below the spot where
stood the gallant Ranger. As the mist slowly rose,
like the upraising of a vast curtain, Harry beheld a
sight that sent the blood, in one wild, warm
current
,
to his heart.
Quick as the lightning flash he beheld two
soldiers
in the crimson uniform of British troopers,
mounted on stout, fleet horses, galloping up the
hill at the top of their speed, their swords
suspended
in the air, and their arms nerved to strike
a wounded man, who drooping to one side of his
steed, essayed to escape up the ascent, while his
noble horse made almost supernatural efforts to
increase
his speed.
At the same instant that Harry saw the wounded
man and his pursuers, he beheld a body of some
dozen dragoons galloping in the rear; while down
the hill, in the centre of the valley, the main force
of the company (some twenty troopers in all) were
gathered around a fire, in the act of springing upon
their horses, as if disturbed by some unexpected
alarm.
Scarce had Lieutenant Heft time to gather these
particulars at a hurried glance, and ere he could
draw a bridle rein, or give his horse the spur, he
discovered that the wounded man was none other
than his companion Dennis, and at the same
moment
his cry for quarter broke upon the air; but
the uplifted swords of the dragoons descended,
winged with all the force of their muscular arms,
and the body of the American Ranger was hurled
to the earth, while the riderless horse dashed by
Harry Heft with his neck arched, his eyes
distended
,
his mane flying, and the saddle on his back
smoking with his master's blood.
Raising his rifle to his eye, with his blood boiling
with rage at the scene of merciless carnage which
had but now taken place under his very vision,
Harry Heft brought the glittering barrel to bear
upon the foremost of the troopers, and, in a flash,
a lifeless body fell from the war horse, and the
green sod bore upon its bosom the murderer and
the murderedthe dragoon in his scarlet attire and
gay trappings, and the free hearted Irishman in his
uniform of black, changed to a ghastly purple by
the red current that poured a gushing torrent from
his heart.
The sharp cracking sound of Harry's rifle had
not ceased to ring upon the air, when the war
shout of the Black Rangers swelled through the
woods, and in an instant, dashing through the copse,
as one man, the brave twenty-four, with
Herbert
at their head, followed Harry down the hill at
5
the top of their horses' speed, each man with his
short, straight sword raised in the air, adding vigor
and volume to the yell of vengeance which arose
from the band, as each eye beheld the bleeding
form of Dennis the Irishman.
Down the hill they came, their gallant steeds
moving with one impulse, as though they were
but limbs of the same vast animal. At the sight,
the twelve British Dragoons halted half way up
the hill, in the full sweep of their career, and with
horses recoiling on their haunches, seemed scarce
to know whether to face the advancing avalanche,
or to fly before its approach.
Not an instant had they for reflection, for the
Black Rangers came on toward them with the
speed of a thunderbolt, and the voice of Harry Heft
was heard above all other sounds
RangersDennis cried for quarter, and they
murdered him! Shall we give them quarter?
No quarter, shouted Herbert Tracy, raising
himself in his stirrups and measuring the distance
between his men and the twelve dragoons, with a
glance of his eye, no quarter! no quarter! The
bullet and the sword for the caitiffs. Over them,
Rangers, over them!
No quarter! echoed the Rangers, no
quarter
!
Dennis McDermott! shouted Harry.
The trumpeter boy! replied Sergeant Brown.
Over them! Down with the caitiffs!
reechoed
the Rangers, with one voice, no quarter!
And in one compact body, of four abreast, with
their steeds presenting a firm and unwavering
front, the Black Rangers passed like a whirlwind
over the shrinking forms and recoiling horses of
the twelve dragoons. And as the Nighthawks
swept on, with their front unbroken and their ranks
undisturbed, the British soldiers rolled on the
earth, some crushed beneath the weight of their
horses, others with their arms and legs broken,
and others pouring forth their lives on the sod,
from the mortal gash inflicted by the short swords
of the Rangers, in the very crisis of their charge;
and all of them, man and steed, were scattered
upon the earth, an indiscriminate mass of crushed
bodies, of mangled horses and dying men.
As the Rangers passed on in their career of death,
down the hill and toward the centre of the valley,
the main body of the British dragoons formed in
solid phalanx in the level of the vale, presenting a
front of four abreast, with a wood on either side
of their position, and the passage of the glen visible
in their rear. The fog had been raised from the
bed of the valley, by the action of the large fire
which the dragoons had kindled, and the light
wreaths of mist curled gracefully among the
treetops
and around the hills, leaving the small level
plain perfectly clear from all obscurity, and free
from all exhalations.
CHAPTER THE SECOND.
THE CHARGE.
The
British Dragoons awaited the approach of
the Rangers with sword drawn, and steeds firmly
planted against each other, in a solid parallelogram,
and with the determination to avenge their
comrades
,
whom they could not save, visible in each
countenance, in the flashing eye, the curling lip,
and scowling brow.
The Americans came thundering on, and twenty
paces lay between them and their foes. Another
moment and they would join in deadly contest,
swords would flash, and bullets whistle, and their
blood intermingle like streams of water.
At this moment, when every breath was hushed
with intense expectation, the deep-whispered word
of command came from the lips of Herbert Tracy,
and with the celerity of thought, his men divided
from one another, like drops of rain from the
bursting cloud, and in an instant, the forms of
twelve of their body were concealed in the woods
to the right of the British soldiers, while the other
twelve with Tracy at their head, sought the cover
of the forest on the opposite side of the vale.
Each Ranger reined his steed up by the trunk of
some giant tree, and lifting his rifle to his shoulder,
brought its tube to bear upon the head of a
particular
dragoon, or in common parlance picked his
man; and as the British soldiers turned to pursue
their scattered foes, a stunning report broke from
the woods on either side, and of the twenty-three
rifle balls, nineteen proved faithful to the aim, and
as many steeds were without riders, while the
ground was strewed with the British dead.
Herbert, too, had raised his rifle, and selected
for his mark, the breast of the commander of the
party, the barrel was leveled, his finger on the
trigger, but at that instant the officer in issuing
some hurried command to his men, turned his face
toward Captain Tracy, and the arm of the Partizan
Leader dropped nerveless by his side. He beheld
the face of Lieutenant Wellwood Tracy, and he
could not kill him. Lieutenant Wellwood Tracy,
his antagonist in love, in honor, in the affections of
his father; the man who made no scruple of
usurping
every right belonging to him by the decree of
God and nature, was before him, in the line of his
rifle, and yet he could not fire.
The British Lieutenant looked confusedly round
the dead and the dying about him. Ere he could
attempt an escape, he was surrounded by the two
divisions of the Rangers, uniting from either side
of the vale, with the tall and commanding form of
Herbert Arnheim Tracy towering in the midst.
Dennis McDermott! shouted Harry Heft,
whose blood was turned to gall, in his stern
determination
to avenge the IrishmanDown with
the Britisher! No quarter!
The trumpeter boy! cried Sergeant Brown
No quarter!
No quarter! re-echoed the Rangers, and
twenty-three swords were unsheathed over the
head of Wellwood Tracy. The British Lieutenant
glanced hurriedly around, and seemed endeavoring
to recover his self-possession, when Herbert Tracy
threw his horse between the Rangers and the
object
of their anticipated vengeance.
Rangers, I beg this man's life of ye! he
exclaimed
He
must not,
shall
not be slain!
Lieutenant
Tracy, you are my prisoner.
So I perceive, observed the Lieutenant, with
a ghastly attempt at humor. But a moment
since, you might have been indebted to these
gentlemen
for ridding you of the care of a prisoner,
in the most expeditious, if not the most honorable
way. You might, by !
It is ill jesting with men whose swords are
whetted for blood, by the sight of a murdered
comrade
,
replied Herbert, placing himself at the head
of his men, and galloping toward the spot, where
Dennis McDermott had been murdered, look to
your prisoner Sergeant Brown.
The Rangers arrived on the spot half way up
the hill, where lay the dying Ranger, for life had
not yet altogether departed from his manly frame.
He was terribly gashed, a deep sword wound laid
open the scalp of his head, and his shoulder blade
was broken, by a downward blow that had evidently
been propelled by no weak arm. A stream of
blood flowed without intermission from a bullet
wound near his heart, and the crimson current had
flooded the sod on which he lay, and was now
trickling down the hill.
Dennis, my boy, said Harry, kneeling beside
the wounded man, look up, Dennis, my boy!
We paid the scoundrels for their treacherywe
did! For every drop of your blood, a bucket-full
of the British puddle has been spilt. Look up,
Dennis, my boy!
The dying man passed his hand over his eyes,
and wiped away the blood, which streamed from
his gashed forehead, and obscured his vision.
Ye paid 'em did ye? he exclaimed, faintly,
as Harry supported his head.
Aye, did we. Thirty of the red coats have
bitten the dust.
Thirty, did ye say? be jabers, Harryochone!
The wife and the childer be the Lakethe Lake
of KillKillOch! I'm kilt meself. Will ye not
wipe the blood out o' my eyes, Harry HeftI'd
like to seeto seesure the sun's going down,
Harry Heft, and its getting darkIt's a lone world
I'm going to, Harry Heft, and never a priest to
show me the way. Remimber me, Harrymasses
for me sowlOch! but it's dark!
And with a rattling sound at the throat, like
suffocation
,
the brave Ranger made a desperate
struggle
,
as though he were wrestling with some
invisible
foe, and then, with a faint attempt to clear the
blood away from his eyes, he sunk into the arms of
Harry Heft, and ceased to live.
Thick, burning tears streamed down the bluff
Ranger's cheeks, as he gazed at the lifeless corse.
If I don't make 'em pay for this, he muttered,
it's no matter; that's all.
Comrades! exclaimed Sergeant Brown, we'll
have to shout two watchwords in the field to-day.
`This for the trumpeter boy' for every shot we
fire, and `that for Dennis McDermott' for every
sword cut we make.
A deep murmer of assent arose from the Rangers,
who with their Captain gathered round the corse of
the murdered man.
I am really sorry, exclaimed Lieutenant
Wellwood
Tracy advancing, that my drunken troopers,
by such a barbarous act, should have provoked such
a sanguinary massacre of my whole commandI
am sorry, by !
Lieutenant Tracy, interrupted Herbert, if
you are willing to give me your parole of honor,
not to bear arms against the American forces until
you are properly exchanged, I will accept it, and
you may depart at your own pleasure.
The Lieutenant seemed not very well pleased
at this sudden interruption, however he gave his
parole of honor, mounted his horse, and galloped
toward the British lines. Callous and cold hearted
as was Lieutenant Tracy, it was not without some
feelings of emotion, that he looked back, from the
passage of the vale, to the scene of the late
skirmish
,
and marked in place of the lusty soldiers,
who had accompanied him thither, the mangled
forms of the dying and the dead strown over the
sod, which was crimsoned with their blood.
Mount, Rangers, and away! shouted Herbert.
Hark! They are in action at Chestnut Hill! Mount,
and away!
Captain Tracy, exclaimed a voice from among
the heap of wounded and dying, for a cup of
water, I can tell ye a tale that it might like ye to
hear. Miss Waltham
Miss Waltham? What of her?
The water firstthe water murmured the
wounded man.
The water was brought from a brooklet, that ran
down the side of the hill, and having drained the
canteen to the last drop, the trooper proceeded
with his story. He proved to be the drunken
soldier, who had come in contact with Harry at
the Quaker's house, where he had been suffered to
rest under the table until late at night, when by
some means or other, he became possessed of the
fact that Miss Waltham was in the farm house.
Wandering along the fields, he fell in with his
master, the Lieutenant, who was just returning to
camp after the fruitless search for his bride. He
presently became aware of Miss Waltham's hiding
place, and with Col. Musgrave proceeded to the
farm house, informed the young lady that they felt
bound to escort her across the country, to the
mansion
of a friend, where the Colonel was quartered,
and where she could remain, until the pleasure of
her father might be known. Miss Waltham begged
to be taken to her father's house, but that was
impossible
,
the Colonel said; they were bound to
hurry across the country and be with their
commands
by day break; and the only way left them
to manifest their interest in her safety, and protect
her from the violence of a rebel leader (they
affected
to treat Herbert as an entire stranger) was
to request her attendance, to the mansion of a
common
friend. Glad, at all events to have escaped
the hated marriage, Miss Waltham yielded her
consent
,
to what she could not well refuse, and
accompanied
the Colonel and Lieutenant to the mansion
which they designated.
Well, my wounded terror of turkies, exclaimed
Harry, when the trooper had proceeded thus far,
had I known last night that you been up to
cuttin' sich deviltries, I'd a put a stopper on you,
mighty quick. I say, Captain, these red coats are
swelling their accountit 'ill be full a'ter a while.
Mount, Rangers, mount and away! shouted
Herbert, who had mused deeply on the trooper's
storywe will have warm work to-day, by that
firing yonder! Away, Nighthawks?
CHAPTER THE THIRD.
THE ATTACKTHE CHASETHE HAVOC.
Look
! shouted Herbert Tracy, as he halted
his steed for an instant on the brow of a hill, within
pistol-shot of the Germantown Road, below Mount
Airy. Look ye, my Rangers, how the Loyalists
flee! See how the Continentals sweep all before
themthere's Mad AnthonyI'd swear to the
stroke of his swordand there's Pulaskithere's
Washington in the very centre of the melee. A
blow for Washington, Rangers! Whoop and
away!
With an answering shout, the Rangers dashed
down the hill, and swept across the plain toward
the Germantown Road.
While Herbert Tracy was engaged with the troop
of Lieutenant Wellwood, a mile westward of
Chestnut
Hill, the central body of the American troops,
under Wayne and Sullivan, with Washington at
their head, had reached Mount Airy, surprised a
battalion of light infantry, lodged in Allen's house
in that vicinity, and, by a bold and determined
movement, drove the enemy before them at
pleasure
,
following up the work with all the flush and
heat of an unexpected triumph. Scattering their
arms along the way, or ever and anon turning to
face their pursuers, the remains of the battalion of
light infantry proved the aptness of their name,
and, in the course of fifteen minutes, fled
precipitately
down the Germantown Road, for the distance
of three-quarters of a mile, until they reached the
point where the 40th Regiment was stationed,
under the command of Col. Musgrave.
Here the attack was renewed with all its vigor,
and the American soldiers pressed forward as one
man, and engaged with the British muzzle to
muzzle
.
Col. Musgrave was seen hurrying hither and
thither along the lines, and the form of a tall,
dark-browed
man, in the dress of a private citizen, with
a star of honor on his left breast, was ever at his
shoulder, aiding him in his attempts to restore
confidence
to his men, and riding in the very thickest
of the fight. But it was in vain. In vain did the
British infantry plant their muskets in the sod, and
sinking on one knee, present to the advancing
Americans a wall of bristling bayonets. The charge
of Wayne came thundering on, and his loud
war-cry
Upon
them! over them! rose above the
din of battle. In vain did the British dragoons
form in one solid front, and with upraised sword,
sweep on to meet the American infantry. They
were received mid-way by the fire of the
back-woodsmen
,
each rifle marking its man; and each
shot told as surely and effectually as though it was
aimed at an inanimate rather than a living mark.
The confusion of the scene increased with each
moment. Vast clouds of thick smoke began to roll
in heavy folds over the field of contest, and from
its bosom flashed the glare of musquetry, and the
blaze of the rifle, while the clash of intermingling
swords, the shouts of the combatants, the yells of
the dying, shrieks of the wounded, swelled upward
to the Heavens, in one fearful chorus, more terrible
to hear than the sound of the most fearful
convulsions
of nature, the rumbling of the earthquake amid
the subterranean caverns, or the thunder peals
bursting
around the summit of the Andes. These sounds
strike us with preternatural fear and awe, but the
confusion of a battle-field not only thrills us with
a feeling of indefinable awe, but awakens our
sympathies
almost to madness. In every shout, a man
formed like ourselves bites the dust, in every groan
the earth is crimsoned with the life current of the
wounded, in every peal of musquetry a score of
souls wing their way from all the flush of life and
vigor of active manhood, up to that unseen and
spiritual world that is encircled with all the
shadowy
creations of the brightest hopes and darkest
terrors of the human mind.
At this crisis of the contest, Captain Tracy, at
the head of his Rangers, came rushing on to join
the tide of conflict. Each man with his head erect,
his sword drawn, and his nighthawk plume
fluttering
in the wind swelled the shout of vengeance, as
they poured upon the British host, and as each rifle
winged its bullet, or as each sword sought its living
sheath, the war cry of the Rangers rose high above
all other soundsThis for Dennis McDermott!
This for the trumpeter boy!
It is in vain! cried Colonel Musgrave to the
gentleman in citizen's dress who stood at his side
Major Tracy we must beat a retreat! The rebels
fight like incarnate devils! Awayaway to the
main bodyaway toward Chew's house!
As the order was passed along the British line,
the Americans followed up the attack with
increased
zeal, and the scene became one of deadly
chase and precipitate pursuit on the Continental
side, and of hurried rout and confused retreat on
the part of his Majesty's 40th regiment.
In utter confusion, and heedless of all system or
regularity of march, the British soldiers fled along
the Germantown road, down toward the main line,
at the distance of three-quarters of a mlle.
Now, Wayne, now! shouted Washington, as
he rode in the van of the chaseFollow up the
blow and we have them!
See! how they fly! exclaimed Herbert with
an outburst of the wild excitement of the scene,
On, Rangers, on! This for Dennis McDermott!
Over them, Rangers, over them! This for the
trumpeter boy!
This for Dennis McDermott! shouted Harry
Heft at each stroke.
This for the trumpeter boy! This for Dennis
McDermott! re-echoed the Rangers, as they rode
over the retreating enemy, and scattered panic and
confusion among the British by their singular
appearance
,
their uniform of sable, their short sword,
which they used with a celerity and expedition that
defied all the tactics of the European soldiers, and
their rifle that uttered its volume of flame every
instant, while their jet black horses swept on with
the speed of wind.
Meanwhile, far on the American left, to the
westward
of Chew's house, Greene engages with the
enemy's right, and the militia of Maryland and
Jersey
attack his rear, at the same time that the
Pennsylvanian
troops pour down the Ridge Road, and
throw their force upon the left of the British wing.
The sounds of battle disturbed the quiet shades
of the Wissahikon, and resounded over the fields,
along the village, to the hills on the east, and every
movement of the opposing combatants, tended to
make Germantown the centre of the contest.
The fog which had been raised for a moment at
sunrise, again passed over the landscape, and
involved
the scene of strife in mist and darkness that
gave additional horror to the fight. As the
divisions
of Wayne and Sullivan swept along the
Germantown
Road in the pursuit of the enemy's 40th
regiment, the conflict, to the British left, began to
deepen, and the smoke of battle rolled over the farm
house of the Friend Joab Smiley, who stood gazing
from a window upon the scene of strife and
bloodshed
.
Dame Smiley sat in one corner of the apartment
with her face buried in her hands, to veil her eyes
from the vivid flashes of the cannon, which like
lightning ever and anon streamed through the
windows
.
Her daughter, the fair Marjorie, with her
dark hair all dishevelled, and her hands clasped in
silent prayer, buried her face in her mother's bosom,
in a half-kneeling, half-reclining position, while
her bosom heaved upward from its scanty covering,
and sobs and sighs of indefinable terror convulsed
her slender form. Near the mother and daughter,
with his large eyes fixed upon his massive,
pawlike
hands, which were laid upon his knees, sat the
negro, Charles the First, whose wanderings
across the country, on his way to Major Tracy's
mansion, had been suddenly terminated by the
conflict
of the opposing armies, and he was forced to
seek shelter in the farm house of the Quaker.
Apart from all the others, looking from the
northern
window of the apartment, stood the Quaker
farmer, his muscular form raised to its full height,
his head erect, and his stout arms folded upon his
prominent chest, as he gazed sternly upon the
scene of conflict.
The surrounding hills and woods were enveloped
in the thick fog that enshrouded the entire face of
the country, yet still the Quaker could perceive
the form of men mingling in deadly conflict, and
the red glare of the cannon would for an instant
lift the curtain of mist, and the scene of death was
laid bare to his view.
Therethereis the flag of the Continentals,
he exclaimedNow it is downthere sails the
crossthe blood red cross of the British men.
Verily
it is terrible to see so much strife and
bloodshed
.
Now the Americans march up the hill
there go their war horsesnow they are driven
backHa!Verily!
The Quaker drew a long breath, and stifled the
exclamation that was about to issue from his lips.
I am a strong man, muttered the farmer, and
I stand and look on while my neighbors are
murdered
.
Verily, Hannah, I will even go forth to
the fieldI will forth to the field, HannahHa!
Verily!
Surely, Joabexclaimed his wife, starting on
her feetthee will not so far forget thee God, and
thee brethren, as to mingle in the strife of battle?
JoabJoabI cannot think thus hardly of thee?
Father, fathershrieked Marjoriethee
will not peril thy life among the men of war
father go not forth
The maiden's utterance was choked by sobs, and
she fell weeping upon her mother's shoulder.
Ha! verily! I will go forthalonethere
may be wounded who cry in vain for the cup of
waterthe maiden Waltham may be in danger.
Harry Heft may be dying, and I standing here like
a block of stone, looking calmly on. I must go
forth to the field, wifehold me not, daughter. I
must forthI'll be with ye presently
Sure's my name's Chawls de Fust
exclaimed
the negro, rising from his deep cogitations,
I'll go to Massa Chew's house too. Missa
Waltham
may be dar alone and de debble to pay. De
Britishers may shoot meI hab but one life
Massa Smiley I go wid you. Dat am a fac.
Charles thee is a good fellow. Come with me
if thy heart fails the not. Nay, wife, I must forth
to the field!
The Quaker and the negro servant issued from
the farm house door, and took their way to the
scene of contest, and while the mother and
daughter
gazed from the window, they disappeared in
the folds of the surrounding fog.
CHAPTER THE FOURTH.
CHEW'S HOUSE.
There
is but one hope for us! shouted Colonel
Musgrave, as his regiment rushed in full retreat
toward
the British line. One hope, Major Tracy!
If that fails, our forces will be defeated
Philadelphia
retakenand the rebel cause triumphant!
We must make a fortress of Chew's House
yonder
mansion of stoneits walls are in some places
three feet thick, and we can hold the place for
hours! Away to Chew's House!
Major Tracy, by his words and example,
encouraged
the scattering regiment to press onward
toward
the mansion, which stood retired from the
road at the distance of near two hundred yards.
It was, and is, a substantial edifice, built of the
most lasting stone, which will resist the tooth of
time for ages. It stands facing the road, with two
wings of stone supporting it in the rear, and toward
the northat the time of the Romancethe edifice
presented a plain side of stone, only varied by two
deep-silled windows, which gave light to that part
of the mansion, one in the first and the other in the
second story. The roof descends with a gentle
slope, and the eves are defended by massive
cornices
,
which give an appearance of solidity and
strength to the building. In front of Chew's
Mansion
,
on the battle morn, lay a wide lawn, reaching
over two hundred yards to the main road of the
village
,
extending south the same distance, and
spreading
toward the north, in an open field, of some four
hundred yards in extent.
This lawn was defended along the road by a wall
of stone, and a few trees were scattered here and
there over its surface, while an enclosure of sheds
and fences, for confining cattle, was pitched some
fifty yards to the north of the mansion, in direct
view of the northern windows.
In the north window of the second floor of the
mansion, Marian Waltham sat gazing through the
gloom and obscurity of the mist, upon the lawn that
encircled the edifice. Her fair bosom trembled
with indefinable terror as she listened to the
increasing
tumult of battle, with her head inclined to
one side, her blue eyes brightening with interest,
and her lips parted with intense anxiety. This
terror the kind offices of the housekeeper of the
mansion, whose portly form was seated at her side,
in vain endeavored to dispel or assuage.
La! Miss Waltham, what's the use of taking
on so! exclaimed the housekeeper, giving the keys
at her girdle an important rattle. As sure as my
name's Betty Fisher, and as sure as Mr. Chew's
family are all at Phildelphy, leaving me to take
care of this place, as sure as I've had to pervide for
Col. Musgrave, and all his rampaging red-coats, jist
so sure will you be as safe here, as though you
were in your own father's parlor, over on the Ridge
Road. And so a rascally rebel run off with you
did he? The ragmuffin! Jist as you were a-goin'
to be married, too? How unpolite
Miss Betty Fisher's round and rubicand face
assumed
an expression of intense curiosity, and her
voluminous figure moved closer to Miss Waltham's
side.
How kind in Col. Musgrave to rescue you from
the rebels' clutches! I b'lieve my heart that old
Quaker was at the bottom of it allI do! Jist to
thinkgoodness grashus! What's thatcoming
from the fogoh! Lud!
Miss Waltham gazed with a hurried gesture
from the window, at the exclamation of the
house-keeper
,
and beheld, rushing from the depths of the
fog, which concealed all objects beyond thirty
paces in the vicinity of the mansion, a confused
band of British soldiers, some mounted, others on
foot, who ran with shouts and imprecations towards
the hall door which opened on the lawn. The
soldiers continued to pour along the lawn for the
space of several minutes, in the same irregular
stream, regardless of order or discipline; some of
their number were covered with blood; others had
their uniform soiled and torn; others were destitute
of arms, and the entire body presented all the
appearances
that accompany defeat and dismay.
There's Col. Musgrave! screamed Betty
Fisher, and there's Major Tracy all covered with
dust and blood, among the rumpaging troopers!
Oh! Lud! here's a purty how d'ye doand in
Mr. Chew's house, too! Goodness grashus!
Ere Marian had time to wonder at the
appearance
of Major Tracy and Col. Musgrave, in the
plight in which she saw them, the room in which
she was seated was filled with British soldiers, and
Miss Betty Fisher hurried her fair charge away, to
an obscure corner of the mansion.
While the preparations for an obstinate defence
were progressing in every part of the mansion, the
American troops, in pursuit of the flying enemy,
arrived in full chase, along the Germantown Road,
in front of the field in which the edifice was
situated.
Herbert Tracy with his men, placed, together
with the Partizan Legion of the brave Lee, near
the person of the Commander-in-Chief, swept on
in the very van of the pursuit. When the
American
forces were called to a sudden halt, in front of
the mansion, so thick were the clouds of dust, and
the smoke of battle that rolled over their heads, and
so dense was the fog that enveloped their line of
march, that when the young captain gazed around
him, all objects beyond the vicinity of his own men,
were wrapt in obscurity. The stately form of
Washington, surrounded by his staff, was visible,
however, amid all the mist and gloom, as an
aid-de-camp
came galloping up, and gave information
of the lodgment of Col. Musgrave with six
companies
of infantry in Chew's mansion.
Shall we press onward, exclaimed
Washington
turning to the brave men around him, in
pursuit
of the main body of the enemy who are flying
before us, or shall we halt and dislodge the party
of Col. Musgrave, who have thrown themselves into
the mansion?
Halt! by all means, cried General Knox, it
is against every rule of warfare to leave a fortress,
possessed by an enemy, in the rear.
What! exclaimed Col. Pickering, Shall we
call this a fort, and lose the very moment of
success
?
Let us press onward! cried Wayne, who at
that moment rode up to the side of Washington,
with his sword dripping with blood. Let us press
onward! Onward, and follow up the rout of the
enemy, while our troops are flushed with success!
Onward, and with another blow the day is ours!
Onward! exclaimed Lieutenant Colonel
Hamilton
.
This is the very crisis of the action.
While we attack the house, the enemy will rally,
and we shall see the laurel of victory plucked rom
our brows in the very moment of triumph!
Onward, and over them! cried Captain Tracy.
Now the day is our ownin ten minutes we may
flee from the very field of triumph with the British
pressing on in our rear!
The cry was echoed by all the junior members
of the staff, but their opinion was overruled by that
of the veteran Knox, who, supported by other
senior officers, advised an immediate attack upon
the house.
The roar of a steady fire of musquetry pouring
from every window, from every nook and cranny
of Chew's House, now came rolling through the
fog, and scattered death and confusion through the
American troops, who rushed into the very jaws
of the enemy's artillery.
Chew's House became the centre of the fiercely
contested fight. Greene's column to the east were
engaged hand to hand with the forces of the enemy
in that quarter; Armstrong was thundering away
into the ranks of the foe westward of the house,
and every moment decreased the distance between
the various wings of the opposing armies aad the
centre of the battle.
The American artillery was arrayed on the
opposite
side of the Germantown Road, at the distance
of two hundred yards from the house, with the
mouths of the cannon so arrayed, that the balls
would strike the north-west corner of the mansion.
The thunder of the cannon opened full on the
6
house, but the aim of the gunners was rendered
uncertain
by the pressure of the fog; and the
American
infantry were about to advance and attempt
to carry the temporary fortress by storm, when it
was determined to send a flag of truce and summon
Col. Musgrave to surrender.
A young and gallant officer, of Lee's Partizan
Legion, was selected from among the throng who
offered to bear the flag. Assuming the snow-white
emblem of peace, held sacred by all nations, the
brave soldier approached the house, and was within
twenty paces of the hall door, when a blaze of
flame issued from a window, and the young officer
measured his grave upon the sod, while the flag of
truce was stained with the warm blood of his
heart.
A yell of horror broke from the American army
at this ghastly spectacle, and the attack upon the
house was renewed with a keen desire on the part
of each soldier to avenge the young officer, and as
each column marched up to the mansion, the name
of the murdered man accompanied each peal of
musquetry and swelled high above the thunder of
the cannon.
The plan of the attack on Chew's house forced
nearly one-half of the central body to stand by and
witness the slaughter of their comrades before their
very eyes, without being able to raise a hand in
their defence.
Taking advantage of this inactivity, General
Grey wheeled the front of the left wing of the
British army from his position east of Germantown,
into the centre of the fight, and supported by the
fourth brigade under General Agnew, opposed a
successful and terrible resistance to the success of
the American arms. The fire of the British
musquetry
,
enveloping the field in one continual sheet
of flame, was answered by the American fire
flashing
like forked lightning at quick intervals, and
from the depths of the fog, arose the sound of host
charging against host, the roar of the cannon, the
cries, the shrieks, the groans of the wounded and
dying, mingling with the voices of the different
commanders, urging their men on to their various
posts in the scene of conflict, but amid all the wild
uproar of the battle, the deep muttered shouts of
the Black Rangers broke upon the air, and their
sable uniform gleamed through the white wreaths
of smoke, as they thundered along the field in the
thickest of the fight, accompanying the deadly
fire with the war cry, This for Dennis
McDermott
!
and each mortal stroke of the short, straight
sword, with the shoutThis for the trumpeter
boy!
Like a dark thunder cloud, emitting fire and
flame from every point, the Rangers swept through
the foe in one firm phalanx, making a lane of dead
wherever they passed, and leaving the wounded
and the dying scattered in heaps in their rear.
The Americans fought, each man of them, as
though the issue of the fight depended upon his
separate hand and blow; they fought gallantly;
they fought desperately; they fought undismayed
by the heaps of dead that piled each step of ground
on which they trod; but they fought against hope.
The thick and gloomy mist still hung over the field
like a shroud for their dead, and with its evil omen
blasted every prospect of success.
The fog threw the Americans on the left into
inextricable
confusion, and they turned their arms
against each other. Many a brave Continental
soldier, leveled his musket, through the mist, at
what he supposed a foe, and found himself the
murderer of a friend.
The brave Col. Matthews, of Green's formidable
column, passed to the east of Chew's house, and
drove the British before him like a tornado; on
every side they fled before the terror of his arms;
and his regiment was soon swelled by the addition
of three hundred prisoners. Returning to the
main body in the heat and glow of triumph, he fell
in with a body of friendsas he thoughtand
found himself a prisoner in the heart of the British
army.
Herbert Tracy and his Rangers came galloping
up to the side of Washington in the thickest of the
fight, prepared for any effort that might retrieve
the fatal mistake of the halt at Chew's house.
Never had Herbert seen the Commander-in-Chief,
moved by such deep and powerful emotion as stirred
through every fibre of his commanding frame when
moment after moment, he leaned to one side of his
steed, and received the reports of disaster and
partial
defeat, from aid-de-camp after aid-de-camp,
who were hastening, some from Armstrong's
brigade
,
some from the the command of Generals
Smallwood and Forman, others from the column of
Greene, and all bearing testimony of the fatal
effects
,
of the want of co-operation and consolidation
caused by the halt at Chew's house.
Washington glanced around upon the scene of
confusion and death. His face, usually so calm
and mild in its aspect, was moved in every
lineament
by an expression stern as it was strange to
those features so full of manly wisdom and dignity.
His eye flashed, and his brow gathered a frown,
such as had never before marked his countenance;
his lips were compressed, and his tall figure, raised
to its full height, with an utter recklessness of self
preservation that appeared to possess him in that
moment of agony, when he saw defeat hovering
over the American arms.
Follow me, who lists, he exclaimed, putting
spurs to his steedWe may even yet discover
some vulnerable point around the fatal house.
He rode directly in the fire of the enemy,
toward
the northern wall of Chew's mansion, and in
his train, fired by a generous emulation to share
the danger of the noble man, rode the gallant
Hamilton
,
the brave Pickering, and the daring Lee, side
by side with Herbert Tracy, who surrendered his
men, for the time, to the command of Harry Heft,
and rushed on with Washington and his staff into
the very jaws of the British cannon.
Ere they were aware, the party found
themselves
riding within twenty paces of the northern
wall of the mansion, with a deadly and incesssant
fire of musquetry pouring from the upper window,
and the bullets from the opposing armies sweeping
by their heads like hail, while the sod at their
horses' feet was furrowed by cannon balls.
The danger was imminent, and nothing but
interposition
of a Higher Power could have saved the
life of Washington in that dread moment. The
officers of his staff with one voice besought him to
fly, but, unheeding their exclamations, Washington
rode directly along the northern wall of the
mansion
,
and noted that the shutters of the lower
window
were closed, and that it was barricaded half
way up by a heap of loose timber and brushwood
piled upon the ground, while the muzzle of the
British guns poured a constant shower of balls
through loop-holes cut into the shutters.
Having noted this fact,
[1]
[1]
The following incident is given on the authority of Col.
Pickering, who was in the staff of Washington on the day of the
battle.
the Commander-in-Chief
turned his horse to the American lines, and,
followed
by his gallant band, rode forward, exposed to
the fire of the contending armies, when mistaking
their way in the fog, they presently found
themselves
entangled amid the sheds and enclosures of
the cattle-pen, fifty paces from the mansion, with
bullets peeling splinters from the timbers every
instant, and cannon balls scattering dust and sand
into their faces as they struck the earth on every
side.
Save yourselves, gentlemen! shouted
Washington
,
and every member of the staff leaped his horse
over the enclosure of boards, some three feet in
height, and galloped northward toward the
American
lines, expecting Washington and Herbert Tracy
to follow their example.
Leap, Captain Tracy, leap your horse and save
yourself! shouted Washington, as a bullet lodged
in the pommell of his saddle.
Not till you are safe! replied Tracy, facing
the storm of battle with as much calmness and
self-possession
as though he were but breasting the
career
of a summer shower.
I cannot endanger the limbs of this noble horse
by leaping yon fence, exclaimed Washington.
He has borne me safe in too many a hard fought
fight to think of it. Captain Tracy save yourself
as best you mayI will take the path in front of
the house where the fog is raised by the enemy's
fire!
And ere Tracy could reply, Washington put
spurs to his steed, who sprang through the gateway
of the cattle-pen toward Chew's mansion, and
leaping
over the intervening ground with the speed of
an arrow, bore the Commander-in-Chief toward the
house.
Herbert leaned to one side of his steed, and held
his breath. Another moment, and Washington
would be in the midst of the fire, pouring from the
windows in front of the mansion. Another
moment
and his form would fall to the earth riddled
by an hundred bullets!
He shall not fall alone by the Heaven above
us! shouted the young Ranger, giving his steed the
rein, and galloping across the lawn toward the
houseThere! there! He is in front of the
househe is down! no! He passes! He passes as
I livesafesafe and unscathed! Huzza! Away
Night-hawks!
As Herbert followed in the footsteps of
Washington
,
swept through the blaze of musquetry in
front of the mansion, and taking a sudden circuit,
disappeared in the fog toward the Germantown
Road, as he gave his steed the rein, and rode over
the bodies of the dying and the dead, that littered
every foot of earth, the shrill and piercing sound
of a female voice in an agony of fear broke upon
the air from a small circular window in the
northern
wing in the rear of the building, and the face
of a fair maiden, with eyes dimmed with tears, and
a lip quivering with terror, was thrust out into the
light, while with clasped hands and heaving bosom,
Marian sent up a prayer to Heaven for the safety
of her lover.
Oh! Heaven he is lost! she exclaimed, as
Herbert disappeared in front of the house, he
fallshe falls from his horsethey have killed
himmurderers that they are! Nay, nay, she
continued
,
as Herbert re-appeared on his way to the
main road over the lawnHe is saved! Heaven
be thanked! He is saved!
Here's a purty how d'ye do in Mr. Chew's
house, exclaimed a familiar voice, and Miss Betty
Fisher entered the small and dimly-lighted
apartment
with large drops of perspiration pouring down
her round fat cheeks, her apron usually so neat and
prim all torn into tatters, and her cap, soiled with
soot and dust, suspended by a single thread to her
hair. Here's a purty how d'ye do, in Mr.
Chew's house! I raley wish some folks 'ud stay
at hom, and take care of their own duds. Oh, lud,
such a fright as I've had!
Miss Waltham used all her efforts to calm the
agitated state of Miss Betty Fisher's mind, but in
vain.
Jist to think of it! I jist run down stairs to
take a look a'ter the furnitur', and I'd got to the
first landing, when what should I seeoh, goodness
6*
grashus! there was Sergeant Thompson, sich a
nice-portly
man, a-laying at the foot o' the stairs, all his
elegant ruffles kivered with blood, and all the
furniture
cracked to pieces, the mahogany tables split
into bits, the carpets torn upoh, lud, look there
look out o' the window, Miss Walthamthere's
the ribbles (rebels) a-comin' to fire the house! Oh!
now we'll be burnt up, and Mr. Chew's house will
be turned into a bake oven.
Marian look from the window, and beheld twelve
forms in dark attire emerging from the cover of the
fog toward the house at a quick running pace, and
at a second glance she recognized in the foremost
figure the person of Herbert Tracy, brandishing his
rifle, and leading his men into the very blaze of the
British musquetry.
The maiden took not another glance at the scene,
but seized by a wild impulse of fear with the idea
of her lover's safety uppermost in her mind, she
rushed from the apartment, and scarce knowing
whither she went, passed down the stairway,
entered
an open door, and in a moment stood by the
side of Major Tracy, who, begrimed with dust and
soot, was directing the fire of the soldiers from the
windows of the northern parlor on the ground floor,
toward which Herbert, unconscious of the vicinity
of his father or his betrothed, was fearlessly
approaching
.
CHAPTER THE FIFTH.
THE MEETING BETWEEN FATHER AND SON.
A band
of twelve determined men might
approach
the northern window and fire the house,
exclaimed Washington, the moment he was rejoined
by the officers of his staff within the American
lines. It is a work of imminent danger, however,
and every man of the band will, in all human
probability
,
fall a corse beneath the walls, although the
attempt to fire the brushwood and timber by the
northern window may meet with success. I despair
of inducing any twelve in the army to make the
attemptwhat say you, gentlemen?
I will be one of the twelve! cried Herbert
Tracy throwing himself from his steed.
I'll be another! shouted Harry Heft,
imitating
his example.
And I another? echoed Sergeant Brown,
placing himself beside the captain and the
lieutenant
.
And I another! and I another! the cry went
round, until every man of the Rangers had thrown
himself from his horse and swelled the line of the
self-sacrificing band.
Here are nineteen men, Captain Tracy,
exclaimed
Washington, and a gleam of pleasure
brightened in his eye as he gazed upon the stout
and muscular forms of the Rangers.
The others, replied Herbert, have laid their
bones on the battle-field, or else I can assure your
excellency they would not be found missing!
Yes, yes, captain, but twelve men are
sufficient
,
and here are nineteen.
Will your excellency be pleased to divide those
those who are to remain from the others?
Where all are so brave, replied Washington,
the task is no easy one. My friends, he
continued
,
you who form the left of this brave line
be pleased to step aside.
The seven Rangers stepped aside with the
chagrin
they felt visible on each countenance.
Now, Captain Tracy, I leave the matter to
your discretion. God be with you!
With this exclamation Washington rode off with
his staff to another part of the field, and Captain
Tracy made his arrangements for the performance
of the desperate task, upon which the success or
defeat of the American arms might turn. In a
few minutes each man of the twelve stood ready
to start. Six of the number carried torches and
combustible materials in their hands, while the
other six, the captain and lieutenant included,
grasped their rifles, loaded in both barrels, with a
double charge, and prepared in every respect for
immediate action.
Rangers, exclaimed Tracy, when we
advance
from the cover of the fog, those who bear
rifles will rush forward, and fire in the very faces
of the soldiers who guard the extreme north
window
in the front of the mansion. Those Rangers
who bear the torches will then advancefire the
heap of brushwood and timber under the lower
window in the northern walland while they are
thus engaged, the rifles will pour a second discharge
into the window, and then the entire body will
retreat
.
Forward!
Herbert Tracy led the way over the lawn,
strewed with dead and wounded, toward the
mansion
.
Their path was enveloped in the clouds of
battle, and the rain of bullets whistled by their ears
or tore up the earth at every footstep. It was a
dread moment, and each man of the band sent up
a prayer to that God, before whom he presently
expected to appear, and then every heart beat
firmly and regularly, and every hand was nerved
for the approaching scene of death.
By the Continental Congress! shouted Harry,
when they had gained their way within fifty yards
of the mansion. Jist look there! If there aint
the old Quaker, Joab Smiley, and the darkey,
`Charles de Fust,' right in the centre of the
scrimmage
!
There's a vision, Rangers! Heaven help
my eyes, but I never expected to see such a
sight!
The Rangers looked across the lawn, and beheld
at the distance of twenty paces, the Quaker
kneeling
beside a wounded man, who was placed against
a tree, while the negro stood holding a flask at his
shoulder. The battle was raging around him
men were measuring their graves within arms
reach of the spot where he knelt, troopers were
sweeping past on their way to join the contest, yet
still did that plain, unfearing Quaker tender his
kind offices to the wounded man, bathe his brow
with water, and moisten his parched tongue, while
the unsophisticated negro who stood at his
shoulder
,
half scared to death, by the terrors of the scene,
appeared urging him onward to Chew's house,
where his mistress was in danger, whom the negro
amid all his fears was determined to save.
The noble Quaker is in danger, exclaimed
Herbert as he glanced at the sceneBut we have
no time now to interpose in his behalf! We must
onward!
Every breath was hushad, as the Rangers began
to discern the outline of Chew's Mansion, looming
through the smoke and fog.
What mean those torches glimmering through
the mist? exclaimed Major Tracy, as standing
amid a body of ten soldiers, placed in the extreme
north window of the front of the house, he
discovered
the approach of the Rangers. Ha!
As I live, they are rebels, engaged in the
execution
of some desperate purpose. Now my men,
nowstaywait a momentnow, now. Let
your aim be sure; pick every man of them;
NOW!
The word of command rose to his tongue, when
he felt a hand laid lightly on his arm. He turned
and beheld the form of Marian Waltham; her blue
eyes glaring wildly, her lips apart, her cheek pale
as death, and her golden hair, flowing in disordered
masses over her neck and shoulders.
Mr. Tracybeware! exclaimed the maiden,
clutching his arm convulsively. Pause, for the
sake of Heaven, ere the blood of your son is upon
your soul!
Ere the Major could gather the meaning of the
maiden's words, the voice of the foremost Ranger
arose withoutNow, Nighthawks, now! and the
blaze of six rifles flashed from the lawn into the
open window. Four British soldiers fell heavily
to the floor, and with a wild shriek, Marian laid
her hand upon her heart, her senses swam in wild
confusion, and she sank at the feet of Major Tracy,
insensible and motionless.
Follow me, every man of you! shouted Major
Tracy, leaping from the window out upon the lawn,
while the smoke of the American rifles yet hung
in heavy folds across the casement, and obscured
the vision. Follow me, every man of you!
Scarce had the words died on the air, when
alighting upon the slight embankment in front of
the mansion, he glanced around and beheld through
the smoke, a body of the Rangers in the act of
firing the brushwood, beneath the northern window,
while the other division were moving toward the
window, raising their pieces as they advanced.
Major Tracy sprang from the embankment:
another leap and he stood within arms length of
the advancing rebels. Raising his sword in the
air, he glanced at the breast of the foremost Ranger,
and prepared to plunge it in his heart, when a slight
breath of air, wafted the smoke aside, and Major
Tracy confronted his son.
Oh Godmy father!
My son!
He started back with the quick, instantaneous
movement of surprise, his right arm dropped to his
side, and with his dark, flashing eyes, starting from
their sockets, while his eye-brows were woven
together, with the sudden nervous expression, that
trembled along every line of his face, he gazed
upon the form of Herbert Tracy before him, and
perused every lineament of his countenance, as if to
assure himself that what he beheld was no phantom
or unreal creation of the agitated fancy.
And there stood the son, the same expression of
intense surprise gathering over his face, his dark
eyes flashing with the same deep glance, the same
frown upon his brow, and his right hand grasping
his good rifle drooped by his side, with the same
impulse that unnerved his father's arm.
Oh, what a wild contest was at work in that
father's heart, as he thus stood gazing upon the
child of all his hopes, now banned and cursed, by
those lips that should have spoken but the words of
blessing and the sounds of prayer; how fiercely
were tumultuous feelings sweeping over his soul;
how bitter was the struggle between nature and
pride; between the long indulged feelings of
natural
affection, reviving in all the vigor and the
new-risen bitternass of worldly ambition, opposing
the remembrance of every kindly sympathy, with
the stern thought,he has set my will at defiance
let the consequences be upon his own head; he has
sown in the stormlet him reap the harvest of his
folly in the whirlwind.
At last words came to the father's tongue, and
again the sword was poised in air.
Rebel! he shouted between his clenched
teethNot thus did I think to meet thee, upon
the battle field, with the weapon of thy disloyalty
in thy hand
Father!
shrieked Herbert, as all the
memories
of his infancy came crowding around his
heart.
But,
now
, that met we are, here on this
crimsoned
sod, foot to foot and hand to hand, I tell
thee, traitor, that thou or I must measure out a
grave upon this field. Thou hast a sworddraw
and defend thyself!
Father! cried Herbert spreading forth his
hands, and dropping his rifle upon the earth,
Here is my breast! I make no defenceI offer
no resistancestrike and fulfil your curse!
Friend Tracy, thee must not harm thy child!
exclaimed a voice, familiar to the ears of father
and son, and the stalwart arm of the Quaker, was
thrust before the upraised hand of Major Tracy.
I tell thee, friend Tracy, thee must not harm thy
own flesh and blood, repeated the Quaker, as
wresting the sword from the father's hand, with a
grasp that it was vain to resist, he very coolly
shattered it into fragments upon his knee. Major
Tracy, thee is not in thy right mind, or surely thee
would not demean theeself so unwisely. And
young mandoes thee hear?mount thy
war-horse
and get thee away from the field! Seest
thou not that the Americans are fleeing around
thee? Away with theeaway with thee! Thy
own men are cut down before thee, in the very act
of firing you window shutterHa! verily!
While Herbert, unheeding the scene of tumult
and blood around him, sank on his knees, and
clasped his father by the hands, the stout Quaker,
Joab Smiley, strode aside to the window, where
Harry Heft and Sergeant Brown were struggling
amid the dead bodies of their comrades, against
five of the British infantry, who had clubbed their
muskets, and were raising them over the heads of
the sinking Rangers, in the act of dealing the
death blow.
Hold, friend, thee must not strike thy brother!
shouted the strong armed Quaker, throwing himself
among the enraged British soldiers, wresting a
musket
from each arm, at every word,Thee has no
business to strike thy brother, friendwhat does
thee want with this mischievous weapon? he
continued
,
forcing a musket from the grasp of one of
the soldiersNor does thee want thisnor thee
this(Harry Heft, get thee away and flythee
and thy friend.) Ha! verily! Friend, friend,
does thee resist me? Wilt not surrender thy
weapon
?
Then must I use force! What business
has thee a-walking about friend Chew's ground,
a-cracking people on the head in this style? Hey?
Friend? (Harry Heft, get thee awaythee and
thy friend.) Nay, friends, ye must not resistI
am stronger than yeaway, Harry, away!
With these and similar exclamatiens, Joab
scattered
the muskets of the British soldiers, until
Harry Heft and Sergeant Brown, were enabled to
secure two horses out of the number of riderless
steeds, that were galloping along the battle-field.
I say, Joabuncle Joab, cried Harry as he
leaned from his prancing horse, if ever any body
speaks a word against a Quaker in my presence,
may I be  to  if I don't lick the lie out
of their hide, before they can say Jack Robinson!
Hey! What's that, the Sargent gone too!
continued
Harry, as the brave veteran Brown fell from
his horse, wounded by a spent ball. This has
been a bloody day for the Rangers! Uncleuncle
Joab, I say! Lay hold of yon horse for the
Captain
!
Hallo, there, captaindon't be kneelin'
there to the old gentleman, when you should be
makin' yourself missing! Captain, the day's
against us, the Rangers are all killed, and we must
be off.
Holding the horse, from which Sergeant Brown
had just fallen, in his grasp, the Quaker approached
the father and his kneeling son.
Father, your blessing, your blessing! exclaimed
Herbert, as he clasped the hands of his parent, who
was gazing sternly upon him, as the Quaker drew
nigh.
Herbert, I do not curseI do not curse thee!
But bless thee, I cannot, my son, while thy sword
is raised in most unrighteous treason! I do not
curse, for I cannot heap a deeper curse on thee,
than the curse of loyal blood, which crimsons thy
hands! I must never see thee morenever,
never!
And with these words the stern hearted Loyalist
turned away, and his son never looked upon his
living form again.
The day is indeed against us! cried Herbert,
turning to Harry HeftThe Americans fly on
every side, and yonder is Washington trying to
stem the current. Let us awayyet holdhe
exclaimed, wheeling his plunging horse around
I have naught left for which to liveI will die
upon this fieldI will die with my father's curse
upon my head
Nay, young man, exclaimed the Quaker,
that would be desperate, little better than suicide!
Away with thee, away, while flight is in thy
power!
Fly, Herbert, fly! cried a soft voice which
made the young captain's heart throb with a
feeling
of wild surpriseFly, Herbert, for my sake,
if not for your ownfly!
A fair hand was thrust from the small circular
window in the northern wing of the mansion, and
Herbert beheld the beaming face of his betrothed.
One token of recognition was exchanged, and
dashing his spurs into the flanks of his steed, side
by side with Harry Heft, Herbert joined the retreat
of the American soldiers, who swept in one wild
torrent of defeat and disorder over the ground,
where they had conquered at the break of day.
Massa SmileyMassa Smiley, cried Chawls
de Fust issuing from the hall door of Chew's
house. My Missa Waltham am safeshe am,
gorra-mightylor bless us! Dat am a fac! Sure's
my name's Chawls de Fust.
Verily, I must see the damselexclaimed
the QuakerShe may be in trouble and distress,
and I may comfort her. Nay, friends, look not so
sourly at mehe continued, as he observed the
scowling brows of the British soldiers, who were
rushing by him to join in the pursuit. I did but
take away your weapons for your good. Verify, I
must see the damsel.
And with that he disappeared in the hall door.
Chew's house was now entirely deserted by its
late military occupants who all poured out of its
precincts, to join the current of pursuit which
thundered in the rear of the American host. Along
the Germantown Road, over the fields and
enclosures
between the village and Chestnut Hill, fled
the scattered bands of the American army. In vain
did Washington endeavor to breast the tide of
retreat, in vain did Pulaski at the head of his
troopers, throw himself before the disheartened
fugitives, and urge them by all that they held dear
and sacred, to face the pursuing foe! All was in
vain! And Greene and Wayne beheld their men,
who had borne themselves so gallantly, ere the
bright prospects of the day had been blasted at
Chew's house, turn their backs to the foe, and flee
in utter despair from that field, where heaven and
earth had combined to defeat the American arms.
How the American army retreated to the wilds
of Perkiomen, how the wounded and the dying
strewed the way, how the pursuit was maintained,
and how most of the disastrous consequences of
a retreat were avoided by the care and foresight
of Washington, are all matters of historical
relation
,
and we turn again to the blood-stained field
of Germantown.
CHAPTER THE SIXTH.
SUNSET UPON THE BATTLE FIELD.
The
declining sun was again bathing the
landscape
in its golden beauty, and each sloping hill,
and grassy pasturage, each leafy forest, dyed with
hues of autumn, and each level plain dotted with
orchards and varied by cultivation, looked more
lovely in the setting sunlight, since the raising of
the mist, had imparted new life and freshness to
the view, than when the uncertain beams of the
battle-morn glimmered among wreaths of clouds,
and threw a dim and pallid light along the darkened
air, deepened to the gloom of twilight by the smoke
and dust of battle.
Will thee mount thy horse, Miss Waltham?
Dost not see, young lady, that friend Tracy is
mounted
and ready to start? Nay, Betty Fisher do not
detain the maiden with thy endless gossip, and
Charles, man, what does thee stand grinning at
there, like another chessy-cat.
[2]
[2]
Qu? Cheshire Cat.
With many a warm expression of thanks and
courtesy to Miss Betty Fisher for her care and
attendance
,
Marian took the hand of the Quaker, and
sprang from the hall steps of Chew's mansion, on
to her favorite steed, which the watchful Chawls
de Fust had conveyed from the mansion on the
Ridge Road, over to Germantown, since the strife
and turmoil of the battle morning.
The fair form of Marian was robed in a green
riding habit, which fitted closely and gracefully
around her bust and shoulders, with a ruffle of
delicate
white encircling the snowy neck, while the
skirt of the robe fell in voluminous folds over the
maidenly proportions of her figure, and resting upon
the saddle of her bounding steed, swept in a
graceful
train until it touched the very earth. Her
glossy hair, with all its golden luxuriance, was
confined within the pressure of a small riding hood,
topped by a delicate white plume, and looped in
front with a brooch of the brightest lustre.
Marian's cheek, was deadly pale, and her eyes
were swollen with weeping, for the thought of her
father's death lay heavy at her heart, and as she
glanced at the tall form of Major Tracy, mounted
on his steed at her side, all the scenes of the day
that was well nigh over, and of the preceding night,
rose before her vivid fancy like the fresh
remembrance
of the horrors of some terrible dream.
Shall we move forward, friend Tracy? It lacks
but an hour of sunsetCharles, mount thy horse;
we must be moving.
It reely makes me quite solemn-like to see you
7
all a-going, and scarce a soul in the house but
myself
!exclaimed
Miss Betty Fisher, advancing to
the side of Marian's horse. Oh dear,
oh
, dear,
here's been a purty day of it! And arter the
unmannerly
soldiers have filled Mr. Chew's house
with dead, and broke the furnitur and scattered all
the chiney all over the houseOh! goodness me!
They then must clear out Colonel Musgrave,
Lieutenant
Wellwood and all, leavin' me to look to
their miserable place! Oh, lud, Miss Waltham, I
shall never get over this fright for a twelvemonth.
Don't look so sadthat's a dearcontinued the
loquacious house-keeper. It's a comfort to you
to think, that the ribble officer did'nt run away with
you quite
Verily, Miss Betty Fisher, thee will keep us
here, listening to this prattle, until to-morrow morn.
Let us push on, friend Tracy.
Good bye, Miss Waltham! screamed Betty as
the party rode over the lawnGood bye, and
rimimber me to all inquirin' friends.
Gorramightylor bless me! chuckled the
negroDat ar' woman got a tongue like de
hopper
of a flour mill! Clackclackand no
stoppin'
when it gets a gwoin. Dat am a fac.
As Marian rode along the lawn, toward the
Germantown
Road, on her way homeward, she could
not help noting the awful quietness which had
gathered over the battle field, in place of the noise
and tumult of the morn.
The grounds, as well as the mansion, were
deserted
by the British soldiers, and the dead were
strewn over the surface of the lawn in ghastly
heaps. The grass was trodden down, and wet with
blood, while every indentation or hollow of the
earth, was filled with a pool of the crimson current,
and here and there were were crevices dug in the
ground, by the rolling of the cannon wheels, now
affording temporary channels for the reception of
the clotted masses of human gore that made the
lawn a marsh of carnage.
Pieces of broken muskets, fragments of bayonets,
remnants of shattered swords littered the ground,
mingled with bullets and cannon balls, and all the
ten thousand wrecks of war and battle-strife, were
strewn along, amid the piles of dead bodies. The
beams of the setting sun gilded the pale faces of the
dead, with a momentary light that seemed like a
bitter mockery of the ruddy glow of life, and the
warm flush of health.
Marian beheld death in every shape and position.
Here an American soldier had fallen at the foot of
a tree, and died with his back propped against the
trunk, while his head fell to one side, and his mouth
opened with a ghastly grin. One hand clutched the
shattered musket-stock, and the other lay stiffened
on the wound in his side. Close by him, a British
soldier seemed to have been swept down in the
very moment of the charge. His back was turned
to the sky, one knee was bent in as if he had met
the death wound when running, and his face was
buried in the ground, while his arms were
outstretched
and his stiffened fingers were thrust into
the upturned earth, as though he had grasped the
sod, in the convulsive throes of mortal agony.
Farther on lay a heap of dead, American and
Briton, Scot and German, interlocked in one
ghastly
pile of mangled bodies, some with their faces
upturned to the sunlight, some with their hands
upraised
as if to ward off the descending blow, others
with every limb contorted by the spasm that attends
a sudden and a painful death, while some there
were who lay extended upon the earth as calmly
and quietly as though they had but laid
themselves
down to take a pleasant sleep.
Here lay a youth, clad in the rustic dress of an
American farmer's boy. He lay on his side with
his tangled brown hair thrown over his forehead,
his sunburnt cheek crimsoned with spots of blood,
and his plain and uncouth garments drilled with
bullet holes, and torn by sword thrusts. His
old-fashioned
fowling piece, the companion of many a
wild ramble amid the solitudes of the forest, lay
near his side, and his arm was stretched out as
though he grasped it in his death struggle, but the
stiffened fingers could but touch the shattered stock
without enclosing it in their dying embrace.
And thus along the whole field, in each nook,
each grassy hollow, along the surface of each level
plane, were scattered those who had fallen in the
morning's struggle, resting in all the ghastliness of
death, upon the sod which had bounded beneath
their tread at the hour of sunrise. Had aught been
wanting to complete the picture, it was supplied
by the presence of various mercenary wretches,
who, hovering upon the outskirts of the field,
stripped
and plundered the dead, and scared away a
flock of ravens, who had perched upon their
victims
,
in anticipation of a plentiful banquet.
God of mercy! exclaimed the Quaker, as his
eye drank in the horrors of the battle field, if
ever the fancy might imagine that spirits of the
dark world had built a loathsome mockery of
every high and heavenly sympathy that dwells in
the bosom of man, surely that mocking spectacle
is here, and man outraging all feelings of
brotherhood
,
all feelings of affection, all that is good or
holy in his nature, has laid his fellow man down
upon the earth in all the shapes of death, and
every mangled limb and torn carcase, seems to
bear witness that the Lord God dwelleth not in
man, but rather that he is the temple of the Evil
One!
As he spoke, the party reached the main road, and
Major Tracy spurred on his steed some hundred
yards ahead of his companions, and riding in full
gallop, he seemed to woo the current of
freshening
air, as it swept over his hot brow and burning
cheek, without for an instant allaying the fever of
his mind.
CHAPTER THE SEVENTH.
THE BALL FROM THE GRAVE-YARD.
Major Tracy
rode along in front of the party
until he reached a point where a quiet grave-yard
looks out upon the village street. It was then, as
it is now, somewhat elevated above the level of the
main street, and a wall of rough, dark grey stone,
separates it from the highway, and half shields its
green mounds of earth, and its long lines of
time-eaten
tombstones, from the gaze of the passer by.
He was riding thus leisurely along, with his head
drooped low as if in thought, his eyes downcast,
and his hands on his chest, while the loosened rein
was thrown carelessly upon his horse's neck, and
his entire manner betrayed the absence of all his
musings from the real world around; he was riding
thus leisurely along, and had well nigh gained the
grave-yard gate, which opened into the pathway
from the centre of the wall, when a loud and
startling
report broke upon the still air, the body of the
stern Loyalist swayed in the saddle for an instant,
then pitched headlong to the ground, as a line of
light blue smoke was observed floating along the
grave-yard wall.
Startled by the report, the attention of the
Quaker
was instantly drawn to the quarter from whence
it proceeded. At the same instant that he heard
the quick and jarring sound, he beheld the body of
Major Tracy falling heavily to the earth, and the
wreaths of pale, blue smoke curling in the air above
the grave-yard wall.
Unheeding the shriek that arose from the lips of
Marian at the sight, or the yell of horror uttered by
the negro, Joab Smiley gave the rein to his horse,
and reached the spot where the major fell the very
moment he had measured his length upon the
ground. Joab sprang from his horse, and in an
instant
the head of Major Tracy rested upon his knee.
It needed not a second glance to tell the Quaker
that he held a lifeless corse in his arms. The body
rested in his embrace with the dull leaden weight
of death, the face was pale as ashes, the dark eyes
bursting from their sockets, glared upon the blue
heavens with a cold glassy stare, and the nerves of
the face, along the cheek, and around the mouth,
were starting from the skin, with the electric throe
of sudden death. The silver star, which he wore
upon his left breast, was crimsoned by the current
of blood flowing from the wound near the heart.
Laying the body hurriedly upon the earth, the
Quaker sprang over the wall of the grave-yard, and
as he alighted upon the rising mound of a new
made grave, he beheld the figure of a man, clad in
rustic attire, disappearing among the shrubbery that
overlooked the rear wall of the grave-yard, and, as
he vanished, Joab noted that he held a rifle in his
hand. He pursued the retiring figure, but in vain;
he had fled beyond all hopes of capture, and the
Quaker returned sadly to the highway, where a
group of villagers had gathered around the corse,
and were looking carelessly on, while Marian held
the head of the dead man in her arms, and the
faithful negro servant unfastened his cravat,
loosened
his dress, threw water in his face, and used
every means that his untaught fidelity suggested to
restore his master to life.
Why seek ye not the murderer? shouted the
Quaker, throwing himself into the midst of the
throng of villagers. Do ye behold a man cut
down in the very glow of life before your eyes,
and yet stir not a hand to secure his slayer?
Well, I minds my own business, replied an
uncouth looking villager, I don't know but what
I might tell who sent that bullet, but d'ye see,
friend Broadbrim, this man (pointing to Major
Tracy
)
isis a
tory!
D'ye mark me?
Are you men? cried Marian, glancing around
the crowd, while her eyes swam in tears. Are you
men, and have you one feeling of mercy, or pity, or
justice, or right, and can ye stand and see a fellow
being bleeding to death before your eyes, and
extend
not a hand to his assistance? Shame on ye!
7*
He was a tory! cried a second villager. Go
look at Chew's house, and ask for pity!
Look at the pits filled with true Americans!
exclaimed a third. Go look at the pits dug in
every field for a mile round, and then ask mercy
for a tory!
Why, my friends, cried the Quaker, as his
dark grey eye flashed with anger and honest
indignation
,
did ye mingle in the battle? Are ye so
fond of the right cause, and yet struck not a blow
in its behalf? Verily, my friends, it is my plain
opinion that ye are a pack of pitiful dogs, whose
bark is even more terrible than their bite! As the
maiden saith, so say Ishame on ye, shame!
You'd better not stick any of your hard names
on me, cried the ill looking villager advancing,
for all you are a Quaker, I might chance to strike
you!
Thee might friend, might thee? cried the
Quaker, as he approached the villager; verily,
friend, thee is of no use here; but, on the contrary,
thee grows troublesome. A little musing among
the tombs may do thee good!
As the Quaker spoke, he extended his sinewy
arms, and seizing the villager by the shoulder, very
quietly bore him along to the grave-yard wall, and
then, with as much ease as may be imagined, sent
him plunging over among the tombs with an impetus that tended materially to make this ardent
Hater-of-Tories pray earnestly that he might
alight in a soft place.
With a bland smile on his face, without any signs
of passion or emotion, the Quaker returned to the
group, who first eyed his tall, robust form, and his
Herculean proportions with a significant scrutiny,
and then were content to vent their spleen in
general
curses, upon the whole race of Tories,
Loyalists
,
and so forth.
The sound of approaching hoofs ran along the
village street, and the attention of the group was
attracted toward two horsemen, who came
galloping
from the direction of Chew's House.
They are Continentals! cried a villager,
Continental officers, bearin' a flag of truce to the
British army! I wonder what mought their names
be?
I say, captin', cried one of the horsemen to
the other, in the name o' th' Continental
Congress
,
what does this crowd mean in front o' yonder
grave-yard?
Let us push forward and see, was the reply,
and in a moment their steeds were reined in beside
the group, and the foremost horseman pushed
through the throng and beheld the dead man.
Herbert Tracy! exclaimed the Quaker with
a start of surprise, but the words died on his tongue,
for the son was gazing steadfastly and fixedly in
the face of his father, and his chest heaved, and his
frame shook with emotion, but no tear dimmed his
eye. His grief was too deep for tears, his agitation
too fearful for utterance.
And as the sun went down on that 4th day of
October, in the year of Grace 1777, there they
clustered
around the body of the dead man, as it lay in
the highway of Germantown in front of the grave
yard from which the assassin winged his bullet.
There was Marian Waltham, bending on one
knee, and supporting the corse in her arms; the
tears were flooding her cheeks and sobs of unfeigned
sorrow were heaving her bosom. There was the
Quaker with his plain honest visage and his manly
form; there was Harry Heft, the bluff soldier, with
his face expressive of mingled curiosity and
astonishment
;
there was honest Charles, the negro,
weeping for his master; around were grouped the
careless idlers of the village, and over the corse, in
the centre of the throng, was the form of Herbert
Tracy; his arms were folded, his eyes were down
cast, his dark hair fell wildly back from his
uncovered
brow, and over each lineament of his face
came the expression of unutterable wo that gnawed
at his heart strings for years, and dwelt in his soul
until his dying day.
One thought was gathering over his soul,
absorbing
every other feeling, and crushing every
sentiment
of natural grief
He is deadthe father that I loved! And his
CURSE is on me!
CHAPTER LAST.
THE RE-UNION.THE EXILE.THE MYSTERY.
Autumn
passedwinter, with its storms, was
over, and spring again bloomed amid the groves and
glades of the Wissahikon. The day was serene,
the air balmy, and the earth glad with the verdure
of the trees, the music of the free streams, and the
perfume of wild flowers.
Two young maidens of different stations in life,
as might be seen by their attire, were seated upon the
porch of the mansion upon the heights of the
Wissahikon
,
and as they gazed abroad upon the face of
nature, and drank in the wild delight of sky and
forest and stream, while the fragrant air, was
playing
amid the tendrils of the wild vine that clomb
along the pillars of the porch, they forgot that the
house by which they were seated was desolate, that
its occupants were scattered aboard, and the silence
of its halls but rarely disturbed by the sounds of
human speech.
The light haired maiden glanced at her
mourning
robe, and she thought of those who slept in
the church-yard; the sparkle of the ring on her
finger met her eye, and then her mind was far
away amid the scenes of battle, and her fancy
wandered
with him who battled in the ranks of war,
and who fought against the gloom that was upon
his soul.
The dark haired maiden glanced at the blue sky,
at the forest sweeping in all its verdure along the
height of the opposite hill; she listened to the
lulling
music of the rippling stream, and then her
thoughts were with the hardy soldier, whose frank
bearing, and rustic manliness, had won the
admiration
and the affection of her young heart, in many
a ramble under that blue sky amid those green
shades, and beside the lulling murmur of the quiet
stream.
At a short distance from the porch, a tall and
robust farmer was engaged in cleaning the walks
of a small flower-garden, from the mass of weeds
and wild grass accumulated by time and neglect.
His plain Quaker coat, was resting on the pailing
of the garden fence, and with his muscular arms
unbared, the farmer plyed the spade with every
mark of alacrity and vigor. Ever and anon he
would pause in his employment, and turning his
honest visage to the heavens, he gazed at the deep
azure above, then at the forest around, and finally
his glance would rest upon the forms of the
maidens
seated upon the porch, whom he regarded
with a look of quiet complacency, that told of a
mind sobered by experience, taking delight in the
calm innocence, the guileless converse, and the
ardent hopes of youth.
A little further on, a shining faced negro, with
his arms black as ebony, stripped to the elbow,
was engaged in trailing a wild vine along an arbor,
while his shrill clear whistle broke merrily upon
the air, interspersed with snatches of ditties of
every kind and order of poetical merit, which he
usually wound up with the loud Hah-a-whah!
peculiar to the Ethiopian race.
This spot is more pleasant to thee, Miss Marian,
exclaimed the black haired maiden, turning to her
fair companion. This spot is more pleasant to
thee, Miss Marian, than the loneliness of the
mansion
on the Ridge Roadis't not Miss Waltham?
A thousand feelings, dear Margorie, combine
to make this scene one of the saddest as well as
the loveliest I ever looked upon. I cannot turn
my eye to a flower, a spear of grass, a shrub or a
tree, without the vivid revival of the memory of
the past. Old faces, and well remembered forms,
swim in the air around mevoices that once awoke
the echoes of these walls, again sound in my ears
friends dearly and fondly beloved, are once more
around meand all the wo, the sorrow and care
of the world are forgotten
Has thee heard of Captain Tracy lately, Miss
Marian?
Yes, Marjorie. But his letters are sad and
gloomy, and he seems to be warring a bitter
contest
with the dark remembrance of the past. He
has not mingled with the scenes of battle since the
affray of Chew's House, and the terrible event
that so fearfully wound up a day of bloodshed and
horror.
'Twas a sad thing, the death of Major Tracy.
How strange! That the assassin should never be
discovered!
A fearful mystery is around the whole affair,
Marjorie. Who it was that fired the shot, whether
the hand of the murderer was raised in revenge of
a private wrong, or from mere partizan enmity,
has never come to light. These are times of strife
and turmoiland all the sympathies that bind men
together in times of peace, seemed sundered and
broken apart.
But tell me, Miss Marian, did thy letters speak
ofofLieutenant Heft? Is he still with Captain
Tracy?
The captain is still by the side of the
Commander-in-chief
,
though he mingles not in the
strife of battle. His letters speak of Harry Heft
in the kindest terms. His qualities of a free, open
frankness, and a speech, perhaps somewhat too
blunt and rugged, have proved beneficent to
Herbert
,
and in the company of his honest friend, he
finds a frequent relief from the sorrow that weighs
upon his soul.
A gleam of pleasure brightened in Marjorie's
black eye, and a warm glow flushed over her cheek.
She was about to reply, when a loud shout broke
from the negro Chawls the Fust, and he was
seen dancing about the lawn in every variety of
grotesque attitudes and fantastic postures, that his
lively imagination suggested.
Why friend, thee is surely demented!
exclaimed
the astonished Quaker.
Massa Smiley, Massa Smiley, d'ye hear dat ar'
laugh? A regular haw-haw! Dat am Harry
Heft's laffsure's my name's Charles de Fust!
Massa's comin' home! Lor bless usgorra-mighty!
Dat am a fac.
Marian and Marjorie started up from their seats;
the Quaker leaped over the garden fence on to the
lawn, and the whole party listened eagerly to the
sounds of horses' hoofs, which came echoing through
the woods from the road among the rocks of the
precipice.
In a few moments all doubt was at an end and
two horsemen emerged from the woods and rode
over the lawn, at the top of their horses' speed.
In an instant Marian was clasped in the arms of
her lover, while Harry Heft, unheeding the
presence
of the staid Quaker, was so very rude as to
inflict sundry kisses upon the pouting lips of the
black eyed Quakeress, and enfold her pretty figure
in a succession of loving embraces.
Marian, Marian, my own beautiful Marian
exclaimed Herbert, as he gazed upon the fair face
of his betrothed, while her kindling blue eyes
returned
his fond and ardent gaze. Marian, we
shall never part more. I have returned again to
the scenes of our earliest love, to scenes hallowed
by memory, though darkened by many a bitter
sorrow
;
I will gaze once more upon the green woods
and quiet shades of the Wissahikon and then leave
these hills and vales for ever. Marian, will you
share the fate of a wanderer and an exile?
It needed not the whispered words that came
from the maiden's lip, to tell Herbert that he was
still beloved. The maiden's beaming eye and
blushing cheek, spoke the thoughts that were
fluttering
around her heart.
Marian, whispered Herbert, our love has
been nursed in scenes of joy, it has grown and
flourished amid scenes of trial and wo, and now,
alone as we are in the wide and callous world, we
will be all in all to each otherwe will forget in
foreign lands that ever our path was shadowed by
a single cloud.
Why Marjorie, you minxinterrupted Harry
Hefthow pretty you've grown! How your
dark eyes twinklehow your rosy lips open with
sich a han'some pout, as though you were good
lookin' and you knew it. No, no, Marjorie
there's no use o' poutin' your lips and shakin' your
head. We'll be marriedthat's certain! See
how uncle is shakin' his sides with quiet joy there!
We'll be married for all I ain't a Quaker, and I'll
away to the wars, and fight many a hard blow for
my country yet, though the Rangers, and Dennis
and allGod help me!are dead and gone. And
I'll come back a live man, I promise you, Marjorie,
and we'll be married right off for certain. We
will, by the Continental Congress!
It was the last time Herbert and Marian should
gaze upon the wilds of the Wissahikon. The blue
sky was above, the forest were around, the old
mansion with its closed doors and fastened shutters,
was sleeping in the sunlight.
The arms of Herbert were entwined around
Marian's waist; her face upturned to his
countenance
,
seared by the lines of premature sorrow,
glowed with the happiness of the hour, and her
bosom heaved and her eyes swam in tears of joy.
A little apart stood the manly Harry Heft beside
the blushing Marjorie; in the back ground was the
negro, dancing for gladness at the joy of others;
and in the centre of the group stood the Quaker,
Joab Smiley, his honest visage heightening with
unfeigned pleasure as he regarded the love and
happiness beaming from the faces of all around him.
It was a scene of quiet joy, and one that dwelt
in the remembrance of those who shared the
felicity
of the moment through the long lapse of future
years.
Herbert, entrusted with a mission of the utmost
importance to his country, departed with his
blooming
bride to the gay scenes of the French
metropolis
,
where he remained until the American war
was terminated by the peace of Versailles.
Lieutenant Wellwood Tracy, promotod to a
Colonelcy, left America for England, and then
sailed for India, where his love of pleasure and
dissipation soon supplied him with that narrowest
and quietest of all habitationsa grave.
Harry Heft and the black-eyed Quakeress passed
the quiet and peaceful years of their rustic felicity
amid the shades of the Wissahikon, and long after
the fresh-grown turf, extending greenly along the
lawn of Chew's Mansion, had concealed all marks
of blood and carnage, the blunt soldier and his
pretty wife still lived to tell the story of the 4th
of October, 1777Harry to describe the scenes of
the battle, the charge, the havoc and the retreat,
and Marjorie to picture the fear and consternation
that spread through the habitations of the village
on that eventful day.
Herbert Arnheim Tracy became known in
foreign lands, as an able counsellor in the cabinet
of kings, and tradition relates that after the lapse
of years had borne his fair and beautiful wife from
earth and its sorrows, a warrior whose brow was
seared by the lines of premature age, was known
among the bravest of the brave men who drew
their swords under the banner of Napoleon, and
shared in the carnage at Waterloo, by the title of
General Arnheim de Tracy, designated by courtesy
Monsieur Le Compte de La Wallingford, rather in
respect to his ancient lineage, than from any
actual
possession of the estates of Wallingford, which
finally, for want of a claimant, reverted to the
British Crown. And the murderer of Major Tracy
was he ever discovered? The hand that pealed
the shot from the graveyard wall of Germantown,
was never recognised with all the accuracy and
minute detail of circumstantial evidence. But
tradition
relates, that years after the battle, when the
mansion of Major Tracy had passed into other
hands, and events of the Revolution had assumed
the venerable appearance of antiquity, an aged man,
whose frame was broken down with disease, and
whose brow was furrowed with the traces of long
indulged passions, appeared in the village of
Germantown
,
and sought the shelter of the village
poor-house. In his dying hour, he muttered a
dark confession of a life of crime and infamy, but
the ears of his hearers were in especial attracted
by a tale of horror, which he told of the evening
succeeding the battle-morn.
Returning from the plunder of the dead bodies
that strewed the battle-field, he sought the shelter
of the grave-yard wall, to examine his ill-gotten
acquisitions. While thus employed, he observed
approaching along the main road, an officer whom
he had seen as he prowled from army to army
during the day, prominent in the van of the British
hosts, heading the charge, and fighting in the
thickest of the melee. Seized by an uncontrolable
impulse, the vagabond raised his piece to the level
of the wall, and taking secure aim at the star on
his breast, he shot the British officer to the heart
and then fled. He knew not why he dealt the
blow, but attributed the action to a sudden feeling
to shed blood, that possessed him for the moment,
together with a dimly defined desire to revenge the
death of the Americans who strewed the
battle-field
.
He made this confession and died, but still
a thousand other legends exist with regard to the
matter, and point out a thousand other causes of
Major Tracy's death.
How Major Tracy died, and when and where,
was ever a matter of deep remembrance to his son,
but that he died with the curse unrevoked and the
imprecation unrecalledthat thought harrowed
the mind of Herbert Tracy until his dying hour,
and hung like a cloud of evil omen over the
brightest
points of the pathway of life.
And so ends the legend of Herbert Tracy and
his gallant band of Rangers, with all its wild and
thrilling incidents, which are too much interwoven
with truth and fact, to admit of the unity and
oneness, that gives interest and attraction to a
story purely fictionary in incident and character.
The bones of Herbert Tracy whiten a foreign soil;
his bride, his fair and youthful bride rests far from
the friends, the valley of her childhood; a lowly
mound in a village grave-yard contains the remains
of the bluff Harry Heft and his dark-eyed dame,
and after a lapse of sixty-five long years, the
memory
of the Battle has become a record of solemn
and painful history; yet still around the homes of
Germantown, and among the firesides of the quiet
Wissahikon, lingers and lives the
Legend of the Black Rangers
.October
2, 1777.
Dearest Herbert
I am in great distress, and
hemmed in by the most fearful dangers. If you
have any regard for our mutual love, our mutual
fate, come to me; come to me as soon as you have
read these lines. Nothing but your presence can
avert the fate of
Your betrothed,
Marian
.